About this privacy policy
This privacy policy explains how NHS England and other organisations may use your data when you use the NHS App.
You can download the NHS App on an iOS or Android device. You can also access the same services by
logging in through the NHS website in a web browser
. This policy applies to using either of those channels.
As well as this policy, you should also read the NHS App
terms of use
and
cookies policy
.
Terms we use in this policy
You may find it helps to understand these terms when reading this policy.
Data is “processed” when any action is taken with it. For example, when it is collected or reviewed.
A “controller” is an organisation or person that decides what data is processed. They also decide how and why this needs to be done. They are legally responsible for that data.
A controller may appoint a “processor”. This is another organisation or person that processes data under the instruction of the controller.
“Special category data” is personal information that has more legal protection, including data about your health.
You can find out more about these terms on the
Information Commissioner’s Office website
.
Why we use your personal data
We mainly use your data so that the NHS App works correctly. It means we can give you access to services and information about your health and care.
We may also use your personal data to:
improve the NHS App
resolve technical faults
maintain and improve security
comply with the law
protect users against potential fraud
act if you provide information suggesting you or others may be at risk of harm
We cannot respond to comments added to feedback surveys. If you think you need medical help right now, use
111 online
or call 999. You can also find out
where to get urgent help for mental health
.
If you provide information suggesting you or someone else may be at risk of serious harm, we may share your details with local NHS services. We will only do this to ensure you are offered appropriate support.
Data we process about your use of the NHS App
This section tells you more about data we process to make sure the NHS App works correctly. This includes personal information such as your name and your age. NHS England and The Department of Health and Social Care are controllers for the data described in this section.
How you use the NHS App
This is technical data about your activities when you are logged in. It's also called audit data. It may include the time when you use the NHS App, what actions you take and related technical details. This information is captured against your NHS number. We may keep this data for up to 8 years.
How well things are working
This is also called performance data. We’ve appointed an approved analytics service provider to help us process this data. We may keep this data for up to 1 year.
Your contact with our service desk team
This means information captured when you
contact the NHS App service desk
for support, or when you provide feedback or complete a survey. If you raise a technical issue with the service desk team, we may link this to an Organisation Data Service (ODS) code. ODS codes are unique codes that are associated with particular health and care services, such as GP surgeries. When we capture an ODS code, it is stored in an issue management system alongside other details about the issue. We may keep data about your contact with our service desk for up to 1 year.
Being part of email lists
When you register to use the NHS App, you will be added to an email mailing list for necessary service updates. You may also voluntarily choose to join other mailing lists, for example for user research. We’ve appointed an approved emailing and list management service provider as a processor for this data. How long we keep this data varies depending on which mailing lists you join.
Messages you send and receive
We process data about messages that you send or receive through the NHS App Messaging Service. For more information you can read the
NHS App privacy policy for messaging services
. Messages and replies are stored in your account for as long as your NHS login exists.
Data we collect about you
In the tables below, you can find out more about data we may collect about you when you use the NHS App.
Personal data we collect about you
Data category
Why do we need it?
Name
This is patient contact information that is part of your health record. It is used to:
help our service desk resolve any user issues
enable consultations and file downloads
Registered GP Organisation Data Service (ODS) code
ODS codes are used by the NHS App to produce management and statistical information. This happens at a level which does not disclose personal information or directly identify you.
Organisation Data Service (ODS) codes of sending services
The ODS code of the sending service is used by the NHS App Messaging Service to uniquely identify the sending service. It is also used to look up information related to that service such as the service’s name.
Email address
This is patient contact information that part of your health record. It is used to:
help the service desk resolve any user issues
enable consultations and file downloads
Date of birth
This is patient contact information that part of your health record. It is used to enable consultations and file downloads.
Age
This is patient contact information that part of your health record. It is used to:
help our service desk resolve any user issues
enable consultations and file downloads
Sex
This is patient contact information that part of your health record. It is used to enable consultations and file downloads.
Gender
This is patient contact information that part of your health record. It is used to enable consultations and file downloads.
Physical description
This is patient contact information that part of your health record. It is used to enable consultations and file downloads.
NHS number
Your NHS number is part of your health record. It is used as part of audit tracking and within analytics. It is also needed to enable consultations and file downloads.
Home phone number
This is patient contact information that is part of your health record. It is used to:
help our service desk resolve any user issues
enable consultations and file downloads
Online identifier (for example your IP address, event logs, or NHS login identifier)
This is used to log events, trace faults and provide security protective monitoring log data.
Website cookies
This is used for session and performance management.
Mobile phone number
This is patient contact information that part of your health record. It is used to:
help our service desk resolve any user issues
enable notification and messaging campaigns
Special category data we collect about you
Data category
Why do we need it?
Medical record information
The transmission of medical information (including GP letters, test results and record extracts) between GPs and patients is needed to enable consultations and file downloads. This is extended to file uploads, where you may wish to upload an image to support a consultation.
It is also used for hospital appointment, booking and referral letters and other documents.
Personal information linked to you may also be used to present your hospital appointment waiting lists.
Messages from health and care providers
Messages processed as part of NHS App Messaging and NHS App Notification services will remain stored within the NHS App.
How NHS England may process the data above for analysis
NHS England will process identifiable data from NHS App services:
to ensure the NHS App works correctly
to resolve technical faults
so that the service can be improved
for user research where you have agreed to
to maintain and improve security
processing data for the purpose of linkage and dissemination to produce anonymised data.
NHS England will also process anonymised data from the NHS App services:
to provide high level statistical information
to assess service usage and equality impact
Connecting services provided by NHS England
The NHS App acts as a platform that allows you to access a range of connecting services. These services are separate from the NHS App. The organisations that control and process your data will depend on which services you access.
NHS England has a role in providing some services that connect with the NHS App. You can open the panel below to find privacy policies for these services.
Find out more about connecting services provided by NHS England
Your data sharing preferences
You can choose your data sharing preferences using the NHS App. To find out more about your data sharing preferences you can read the
National Data Opt-Out Service privacy notice
.
NHS website
You may visit the NHS website while using the NHS App. To find out more about the NHS website and data you can read the
NHS website privacy policy
.
NHS 111
You may input information into NHS 111 Online. Read the
NHS 111 Online privacy policy
.
COVID-19 vaccination details
You may access your COVID-19 vaccination record. Read the
Check your COVID-19 Vaccination Record Service privacy policy
.
You may also book a COVID-19 vaccination. Read the
National Booking Service privacy policy
.
Hospital referrals and appointments
You choose to provide hospital referral information as part of the Manage Your Referral service. Read the
Manage Your Referral privacy policy
.
You may be able to view and manage details of your hospital referrals, appointments and bookings, including department. You can find out more in the
NHS Wayfinder services privacy policy
and the
NHS Wayfinder Services Directions 2023
.
GP registration
You may register with a GP surgery using the NHS App or website. Read the
NHS GP Registration privacy policy
.
Your prescriptions
You may be able to view information about your current prescriptions, including a digital barcode you can show to a pharmacist to help them find your prescription. To find out more, read the
Electronic Prescription Service privacy policy
.
Manage health services for others
You may be able to apply to your GP surgery to:
access services for someone else
give someone you trust access to your services
For more information, read the
Proxy application service privacy policy
.
Other connecting services
Some of the services you can connect with using the NHS App are not provided by NHS England. You can open the panel below to find privacy policies for these services.
Find out more about other connecting services
Your GP health record
Your can access your GP health record using the NHS App.
Contact your GP surgery
for copies of their privacy policies.
Your organ donation preferences
You can choose your organ donation preferences. Read the
NHS Blood and Transplant privacy policy
.
GP appointments and prescriptions
You may be able to book and manage appointments.
Contact your GP surgery
for copies of their privacy policies.
You can also order repeat prescriptions and choose a nominated pharmacy.
Contact your GP surgery
and
pharmacy
for copies of their privacy policies.
Personal health record services
For personal health record services that may be provided by your GP, hospital or other care provided, read the
NHS App privacy policy for personal health record services
.
Online consultations
For online consultation services that may be provided by your GP, hospital or other care provider, read the
NHS App privacy policy for online consultations
.
GP surgeries and NHS England
Some of your personal data which the NHS App processes is made available to you by GP surgeries. When the data is at the GP surgery, the GP is the controller. Your data may be sent from the GP to the NHS App. To the extent that NHS England facilitates the transmission of this data, it acts as a controller independent of the GP surgeries, as part its joint controller arrangements with the Secretary of State arising from the NHS App Directions (2023) dated 2 March 2023 ("the 2023 Directions"). This is to enable the services requiring transmission of personal data from GP surgeries on the NHS App. NHS England and the Secretary of State as joint controllers are determining the means by which such transmission of personal data is transmitted in NHS App but in all other respects the GP surgery is the controller of such personal data.
Privacy guidance about using the NHS App
Logging in
You gain access to the NHS App using your NHS login. This is a set of login details you can use to access a range of health and care websites and apps. You can find out more in the
NHS login privacy policy.
Some phones and tablets give you the option to log in to your NHS App using fingerprint, face and iris recognition. This is also called biometric login. On iPhones and iPads this is called Face ID or Touch ID.
Biometric login is voluntary. It does not stop you using another method to access the NHS App. It is based on technology in your device. We do not have access to or control over the biometric data stored on your device. The NHS App performs biometric authentication against NHS login in accordance with the
Fast Identity Online (FIDO)
standard.
Camera and location information
The NHS App may ask for access to the camera on your device if you choose to use face or iris recognition. You may also be asked for access to your device’s camera as part of the NHS login identity verification process.
Some connecting NHS services may also ask for access to your device location. If you allow access to your device’s location, then location data may be used to help you find services in your area.
Accessing services for someone else
You are responsible for any personal data that you access on behalf of someone else. You may be able to do this by using a
linked profile
.
You must keep this data safe and secure. To the extent possible bearing in mind their age, condition and capacity, you must:
make the person aware of your access and any steps you take on their behalf
seek their consent
make the person aware of this privacy policy and other applicable terms and conditions
Viewing your health record documents
Once you have downloaded a file from your health record, or from the record of someone else, it is your own responsibility to keep the file secure. If you use a shared computer or mobile device, make sure you delete any downloaded files when you are finished.
Turning on notifications
You can choose to turn on push notifications from the NHS App to alert you to new messages in the NHS App Messaging Service. This feature is not available when you use the NHS website to log in.
You can opt out of push notifications at any time. Opting out may limit the types of messages you can receive. Messages about your health and care may continue to be sent by other means, such as by post.
If you use the NHS App across more than one device, push notifications must be enabled on each one. If you share the device you use to log in to the NHS App with other people, they may see your notifications. Notifications can only be sent to one user on the same device.
User research and giving feedback
When you register to use the NHS App, we’ll ask if you would like to join our user research panel. User research helps us to make sure that the NHS App and connecting services are meeting people’s needs.
If you choose to take part, we will email you a short survey to fill in about you and your health. Your answers will help make sure we invite you to user research that is relevant to you. We will also ask you if you want to receive our user research newsletter.
When you have signed up, we may ask you to:
try new features
answer more questions by email
talk to our researchers about your experience of using the NHS App or connecting services
You can always say no to an invite, and you can leave the user research panel at any time.
User research panel activities
Your personal data will only be captured if you choose to provide it as part of participating in user research relating to the NHS App or connecting services. The Department of Health and Social Care and NHS England are controllers for this data.
We’ll collect your name and email address to maintain a mailing list for the user research newsletter, where you have consented to receive it. We will ask general questions about your health and background to ensure we are inclusive in our research, which counts as special category data. The amount of time we keep this data varies depending on the research you are taking part in. We will tell you before asking your consent.
Giving feedback outside our user research panel
You can provide feedback through the NHS App without being part of our user research panel. This feedback goes to the NHS App service desk team. You may also choose to take part in user research activities even if you are not part of our panel, for example in response to a social media post.
The Department of Health and Social Care and NHS England are controllers for this data. A contracted research tools provider is appointed as a processor.
Your rights
You have a right to:
know how and why your data will be collected, processed and stored
request a copy of your personal data
correct errors or omissions in your personal data
to ask us to restrict our use of your personal data (for example, if you think it's inaccurate and needs to be corrected)
For user research activities and your membership of voluntary mailing lists, you also have the right to:
withdraw your consent
ask us to delete your personal data
get a copy of your data in a structured, commonly used and machine-readable format
You can exercise your rights by contacting the relevant controller. For contact details, see the next section of this policy below.
You can also manage NHS App performance data ("analytic cookies"). See the
NHS App cookies policy
for details on how to do this.
Asking a question or finding out more
If you have a general question about using the NHS App, you can check our
help pages
or
contact our service desk
.
By opening the panel below, you can find out who to contact or where to find more information if you have a question about particular data.
Find out who to contact or where to look if you have a question
Your GP health record and healthcare
You can
contact your GP surgery
for more information about your GP health record data, and data about your care.
Online consultations
You can
contact your GP surgery
or NHS England if applicable (see the
NHS App online consultations privacy policy
).
Hospital referrals and appointments
See our
hospital referrals and appointments help page
.
NHS 111
You can
find out how NHS 111 works
and read the
NHS 111 online privacy policy
.
Personal health record services
See the
NHS App personal health records privacy policy
.
Your data sharing preferences
See the
National Data Opt-Out Service page
.
Your COVID-19 vaccinations
For more information about your COVID-19 vaccination record, see the
COVID-19 Vaccine Record Service page
.
For more information about booking or managing a COVID-19 vaccination, see the
National Booking Service privacy policy
.
Making a complaint
If you have any objections or complaints relating to your data, we will investigate and attempt to resolve them. We will make every reasonable effort to allow you to exercise your rights as quickly as possible and within the timescales set out in data protection laws.
You can contact our Data Protection Office at NHS England to make a complaint. You can do this by emailing
enquiries@nhsdigital.nhs.uk
or by sending a letter to:
Privacy Transparency and Ethics team
7 and 8 Wellington Place
Leeds
West Yorkshire
LS1 4AP
We ask that you try to resolve any issues with us first. However, you have a right to lodge a complaint with the Information Commissioner's Office (ICO) at any time about our processing of your personal information. The ICO is the UK regulator for data protection and upholds information rights.
Contact the ICO
.
Our legal basis
By opening the panels below, you can learn more about the legal directions that apply to us, and other important legal information.
Legal directions
The Secretary of State has issued directions to NHS England to deliver the NHS App including some additional features and services to users. The legal direction is titled the
NHS App Directions (2023)
, dated 2 March 2023. NHS England and the Secretary of State are joint controllers for the data we need to provide and manage your NHS App. We only store and process your personal data within the UK and European Economic Area (EEA).
The service to Isle of Man users is provided under a request from the Isle of Man Government using their legal powers, as set out in the National Health Service Act 2001 (an Act of Tynwald) (NHSA 2001). Isle of Man health care provision is provided through Manx Care, a statutory board of the Isle of Man Government established by order pursuant to section 12 of the Manx Care Act 2021 (an Act of Tynwald). NHS England can undertake to provide the NHS App service under S255 of the Health and Social Care Act 2012.
The UK General Data Protection Regulation (GDPR)
The UK General Data Protection Regulation (UK GDPR) sets out the requirements on organisations who collect and process personal data from people in the UK. Where NHS England processes personal data, we need to comply with UK GDPR.
Having a legal direction or request in place puts NHS England under a legal obligation to comply with this requirement and so meets Article 6(1)(c) of UK GDPR. To deliver certain parts of the NHS App, such as when we are using your cookies, we also need your consent so meeting Article 6(1)(a) of UK GDPR.
Your health data has extra legal protection and NHS England must also comply with
UK GDPR Article 9
. To process your health data, we rely on:
UK GDPR Article 9(2)(g) which applies where there are “reasons of substantial public interest”. The Department of Health and Social Care has decided that it is in public interest for NHS England to provide the NHS App to the public.
UK GDPR Article 9(2)(h) which applies as your NHS App supports the provision of health and social care to you.
UK GDPR Article 9(2)(i) which applies as there is public interest in the area of public health. Processing this data allows us to provide services such as vaccination booking.
Our legal basis for processing data
This section gives more information about NHS England’s legal basis for processing data that we are the controller for. Our legal basis for processing:
audit data is to comply with our legal directions.
performance data is the consent you give by accepting our
cookies policy
email list membership details is the consent you give when you choose to join a mailing list.
your contact with our service desk team is the consent you give by accepting this privacy policy, and your agreement if you complete a survey
NHS App Messaging Service data is to comply with our legal directions
user research activities is the consent you give by accepting this privacy policy and agreeing to take part in research, join the user research panel, or receive the user research newsletter
Changes to this policy
The terms of our privacy policy may change from time to time. We will inform you via the NHS App and request your continued agreement if we make any significant changes to our privacy policy, cookies policy or terms of use.
Sub-section Policy: 
Sub-policy 0
https://www.nhs.uk/nhs-app/nhs-app-legal-and-cookies/nhs-app-privacy-policy/:
Cookies on the NHS website
We've put some small files called cookies on your device to make our site work.
We'd also like to use analytics cookies. These collect feedback and send information about how our site is used to services called Adobe Analytics, Adobe Target, Qualtrics Feedback and Google Analytics. We use this information to improve our site.
Let us know if this is OK. We'll use a cookie to save your choice. You can
read more about our cookies
before you choose.
I'm OK with analytics cookies
Do not use analytics cookies
You can change your cookie settings at any time using our
cookies page
.
Skip to main content
Home
NHS App
NHS App legal and cookies
Back to
NHS App legal and cookies
NHS App privacy policies
NHS App privacy policy
NHS App privacy policy: online consultation services
NHS App privacy policy: personal health record services
NHS App privacy policy: messaging services
Sub-policy 1
https://www.nhs.uk/nhs-app/nhs-app-legal-and-cookies/nhs-app-privacy-policy/messaging-services/:
Cookies on the NHS website
We've put some small files called cookies on your device to make our site work.
We'd also like to use analytics cookies. These collect feedback and send information about how our site is used to services called Adobe Analytics, Adobe Target, Qualtrics Feedback and Google Analytics. We use this information to improve our site.
Let us know if this is OK. We'll use a cookie to save your choice. You can
read more about our cookies
before you choose.
I'm OK with analytics cookies
Do not use analytics cookies
You can change your cookie settings at any time using our
cookies page
.
Skip to main content
Home
NHS App
NHS App legal and cookies
NHS App privacy policies
Back to
NHS App privacy policies
NHS App privacy policy: messaging services
The
NHS App privacy policy
provides details of how we use, and process, any personal information you give us.
The information below describes how we use your information when you receive or access a message in your NHS App. The information in this policy also applies when you access these same services by logging in through the NHS website in a web browser.
See help using
messaging services in the NHS App
.
Types of messaging services
The messaging services available in your NHS App depend on what your GP surgery or healthcare providers have chosen.
You may be able to:
view and reply to messages from your NHS healthcare services (through the NHS App Messaging Service)
send messages to your GP surgery (through GP surgery systems)
request advice and view responses from your GP surgery (through an online consultation service)
view and send messages between you and your healthcare provider, for example from specialist doctors at a hospital (through a personal health record service)
Sending messages through GP surgery systems
These are messages between you and your GP surgery.
The messages are sent to and from, and stored by, individual GP surgery systems (such as EMIS and TPP). NHS England displays them in your NHS App.
Your GP remains in charge of your personal information and decides what health information from your health record, appointments and prescriptions is displayed to you.
Your GP surgery is the controller of your personal data. Contact your GP surgery for a copy of their privacy policy.
Online consultation services
Online consultations enable you to use a secure online system to ask questions, report symptoms and get advice.
Your GP surgery contracts with one or more suppliers to deliver online consultation services. The suppliers are commercial organisations and provide a service for your surgery.
Although accessed through your NHS App, they are hosted by a supplier contracted by your healthcare provider. You may be taken to the supplier's system to access this service and see messages.
There is a separate
privacy policy for online consultation services
.
Personal health record services
Personal health record services typically allow you to access messages between you and your healthcare provider online and view information about your health.
Your healthcare provider contracts with one or more suppliers to deliver personal health record services. The suppliers are commercial organisations and provide a service for your healthcare provider.
Although accessed through your NHS App, they are hosted by a supplier contracted by your healthcare provider. You'll often be taken to the supplier's system to log in and view any messages sent through this service.
If you have notifications turned on in the NHS App, you may get notifications when you get a message.
There is a separate
privacy policy for personal health record services
.
NHS App Messaging Service
The NHS App Messaging Service is where you view messages from your NHS healthcare services, including:
updates relating to your NHS App and services available within it
public health announcements
messages specific to you or your healthcare from healthcare providers
You cannot use this feature to send a new message (to NHS England or to your healthcare providers). When needed, your healthcare provider may give you the option to reply to certain messages through your NHS App.
If you have notifications turned on, you'll also get a notification to your device about the message.
Who is involved in the NHS App Messaging Service
As well as NHS England, this service is also provided by:
sending organisations, such as a healthcare provider
contracted communications suppliers
Sending organisations
Sending organisations are healthcare providers who send you messages relating to your healthcare, such as your GP surgery or hospital. They are a controller for the personal data they process to provide you with messages.
They may use a contracted communications supplier to send you a message to your NHS App.
Sending organisations are responsible for:
the content of the message
any onward services they provide, such as a link to another service
acting on any information you provide through messages
supporting non-technical issues with the message contents
processing your preference to opt out of receiving messages in your NHS App
Each sending organisation (healthcare provider) will have their own privacy policy which will explain how they process your personal data to provide you with healthcare services. These are normally available on their websites.
Contracted communications suppliers
Communication suppliers are commercial organisations that are contracted to provide a messaging service on behalf of the sending organisation (your healthcare provider).
The communications supplier is a processor for the sending organisation, which means they only process your data according to the sending organisation's instructions and they cannot use your data for any other purposes.
What personal data is processed and why
Table shows what personal data is processed to provide the NHS App Messaging Service and for what reason
Personal data
Reason for processing
Your NHS number, NHS app user status and your notifications preference
Used to send you messages to your NHS App.  We keep a record of which NHS numbers are registered to use the NHS App and if you have notifications enabled. We share this with sending organisations and communications suppliers so they can decide whether to send you messages and notifications via the NHS App Messaging Service.
Your NHS login ID
Used to verify your identity so that you can access messages in your NHS App via the NHS App Messaging Service.
Message delivery status and meta data
Used to monitor and improve the service, we keep a record of whether the message is delivered to your NHS App or fails and whether you read it.
Message body
We are responsible for maintaining a secure repository of the messages sent through the NHS App Messaging Service. These messages may contain personal data, including information about your health (special category data).
Replies to messages
If your healthcare provider gives you the option to reply to a message, we are responsible for sending the reply to the sending organisation. We'll keep a copy of your reply, which is available to view in your NHS App. The sending organisation is responsible for answering questions and taking any actions in relation to your reply.
How long we store messages
Messages are stored in your NHS App for as long as your NHS login exists. This is to provide the same service you would get if you received messages from another channel, such as text messages.
If you delete your NHS login, you will lose access to these messages and it may affect your access to other NHS services.
The sending organisation will keep a record of your messages and replies according to their own privacy policies.
Your rights
Data protection law provides you with a number of rights. You can exercise your rights by contacting the appropriate controller.
For your rights in relation to your NHS App Messaging Service data, see the
NHS App privacy policy
For your rights in relation to the content of the messages you have received in your NHS App and how this affects your health and care, contact the sending organisation (your healthcare provider)
For your rights in relation to any data privacy objections or complaints, see section 9 of the
NHS App privacy policy
for details of how to contact our Data Protection Officer
More in
NHS App privacy policies
NHS App privacy policy
NHS App privacy policy: online consultation services
NHS App privacy policy: personal health record services
NHS App privacy policy: messaging services
Page last reviewed: 30 March 2023
Next review due: 30 September 2024
Sub-policy 2
https://your-data-matters.service.nhs.uk/privacy-notice:
Privacy notice
The 'Choose if data from your health records is shared for research and planning' service allows you to choose whether or not your confidential patient information can be used for research and planning purposes. This prevents your confidential patient information from being used for purposes beyond your individual care and treatment.
This document explains the choice you have, what it will mean for you and where your choice does not apply. It tells you what information NHS Digital collects and how it is used to provide this service, including your rights and how to contact us. This document forms part of a range of materials and information to help you make an informed choice about how your confidential patient information is used.
Where you have a choice
You have a choice on whether or not your confidential patient information can be used for purposes beyond your individual care and treatment. If you would like this to stop, you can opt out of this yourself or on behalf of someone else. If you want to allow your confidential patient information to continue to be used for research and planning and you have not previously opted out of this, you do not need to take any action. The choice you make applies to publicly funded care in England only.
Confidential patient information
This is information which identifies you and says something about your health, care or treatment. You would expect this information to be kept private. Information that only identifies you, like your name and address, is not considered to be confidential patient information and may still be used. For example, to contact you if your GP practice is merging with another. Information about your health or care that is anonymised so that you can no longer be identified is not considered to be confidential patient information.
Purposes beyond your individual care and treatment
This includes the use of your confidential patient information to plan and improve health and adult social care services. For example, deciding where to locate a new clinic or information used to compare the quality of care provided across the country. It also includes the use of your confidential patient information for research. For example, to develop new treatments for serious illnesses. The choice you make does not apply when your information is used to help with your own treatment and care.
Publicly funded care in England
The choice you make applies to confidential patient information related to health and adult social care services in England, which are publicly funded or have been arranged by a public body. For example, a local authority. It does not apply to health and adult social care services that you receive outside of England or if you are a private patient.
When your choice does not apply
There are some situations where your choice does not apply and your confidential patient information may still be used.
When required by law
Your confidential patient information may still be used when there is a legal requirement to provide it, such as a court order.
When you have given consent
Your confidential patient information may still be used when you have given your consent. Such as, for a medical research study.
When there is overriding public interest
Your confidential patient information may still be used in an emergency or in situations where there is an overriding benefit to others. For example, to help manage contagious diseases and stop them spreading, like meningitis. In these situations, the safety of others is most important.
When information that can identify you is removed
Information about your health care or treatment may still be used in research and planning if the information that can identify you is removed first.
When there is a specific exclusion
Your choice does not apply to a small number of specific exclusions, including:
when information is given to the Office for National Statistics for official statistics, like the Population Census
the National Cancer Patient Experience Survey (CPES) and CQC NHS Patient Survey Programme
data shared with Public Health England for the National Cancer Registration Service, the National Congenital Anomalies and Rare Diseases Registration Service and the oversight of population screening programmes
when data is used to make sure people with learning disabilities and/or autism receive the best care possible when in hospital for mental health or challenging behaviour issues (also known as assuring transformation)
the Children and Young People’s Cancer Patient Experience Survey (for the first 2 years of its implementation. This temporary exemption will then be reviewed)
The National Data Opt-Out applies to programmes/activities which have been approved by the Health Research Authority or the Secretary of State following consideration by an independent group, called the
Confidentiality Advisory Group (CAG)
. In limited situations, the CAG can advise the Health Research Authority or Secretary of State that the National Data Opt-Out should not be applied to specific programmes or activities it considers. The CAG carefully considers each request, with specific emphasis on the impact that the National Data Opt-Out will have on patient safety. You can find minutes of the CAG's considerations on these requests on the
Confidentiality Advisory Group meetings and minutes website.
.
Separate to this process, some programmes have expressed concerns that the application of the National Data Opt-Out will significantly negatively impact the operation of that programme (for instance where application of the National Data Opt-Out makes effective analysis difficult or where the data collected is used for multiple purposes, such as direct care). These programmes have been asked to apply for a postponement of application of the NDOO for no more than 12 months from 31 July 2022. This will enable further consideration to be given to these programmes and work towards compliance. On the
All programmes which have been approved following CAG consideration to which the NDOO should not be applied can be found
Programmes to which the NDOO should not apply to site.
.
You may be able to make a separate decision on whether or not your information can be used by some of the other services listed.
Make a separate choice for the National Cancer Registration Service
Make a separate choice for the National Congenital Anomalies and Rare Diseases Registration Service
Make a separate choice for population screening programmes
Make a separate choice for assuring transformation data
Please Note
The list of exclusions can change where a case has been made to the Department of Health and Social Care that the data collection is too significant to risk losing some patient data. For example, when the information may be required to inform key Government commitments and policies.
Every effort is made to ensure this list is updated in a timely manner when any new exclusion is agreed, or a previous exclusion is withdrawn.
Other exclusions where your choice will not be applied:
when data is used to make sure correct payment is made when there is no contract. For example, if a patient lives in Bromley but is treated in hospital in Devon, an invoice will be sent from Devon to the commissioning organisation in Bromley that holds the budget for the patient
when the confidential patient information does not contain your NHS number and if obtaining the number would involve disproportionate effort. This exclusion is likely to apply in limited circumstances as health organisations are legally obliged to use the NHS number. It may apply to historic data or to some adult social care services like home care.
When your choice will be applied
The choice you make will be respected and applied by NHS Digital and Public Health England first, before being rolled out gradually across all other national organisations. All other health and care organisations are required to comply by 30 September 2021 (delayed from March 2020 to allow organisations to focus on the COVID-19 outbreak.). Local health and care organisations are required to inform their patients once they have taken steps to comply with the national data opt-out policy. You may wish to check any privacy information provided locally.
From registering your decision, it can take up to 21 days before your choice is applied to data being used across all health and care organisations.
How your data is processed to register and apply your choice
NHS Digital is the data controller for the data collected and processed to provide the 'Choose if data from your health records is shared for research and planning' service. This section explains how we process your data, your rights and how to raise concerns if you are not happy.
Information we collect from you
If you wish to make a choice, or to view or change your existing choice, we first need to check who you are. We match the information you provide (for example name, date of birth, postcode and NHS number) with information we already hold on our system. The information we need will depend on how you access the service.
You can manage your choice by:
using the online service
using the assisted online service
post
using the NHS App
Accessing the service
Online & Assisted Online
We ask for your name, date of birth, postcode and/or NHS number. Once we find a match and verify this, using a passcode sent to your registered mobile phone or email address, we do not keep this information.
NHS App
Your identity is verified through the registration and login to the App itself. Only your NHS number is passed to the 'Choose if data from your health records is shared for research and planning' service.
By post – making a choice for yourself
We ask for your name, address, postcode and NHS number. If you are unable to provide an NHS number, you will need to provide copies of two identification documents (one confirming your name and the other confirming your address).
By post – making a choice on behalf of another adult
We ask for your name, address, postcode and proof that you can act on behalf of the other person, like a Lasting Power of Attorney. For the individual you are making a choice for, we ask for their name and NHS number. If you are unable to provide their NHS number, you will need to provide copies of two identification documents for this person (one confirming their name and the other confirming their address). Once we have completed the verification checks these documents are retained for 3 months before being disposed of as confidential waste. If original documents are sent in error, these will be returned to you securely.
By post – making a choice on behalf of a child
We ask for your name, address, postcode and for you to sign a declaration that you have parental responsibility for the children named on the form. For the children you are making a choice for, we ask for their name and NHS number. If you are unable to provide their NHS number, you will need to provide a copy of their passport or birth certificate. Once we have completed the verification checks these documents are retained for 3 months before being disposed of as confidential waste. If original documents are sent in error, these will be returned to you securely.
Information we store
Once we have matched you to your individual record in our secure data store, your choice is stored against your NHS number. This is the minimum amount of information that we need to provide this service.
We record and store audit data each time you use the service, including:
the date and time
whether you used the online, assisted online, postal or NHS App service
whether the choice you made was for yourself or for another person
Your internet protocol (IP) address is also stored to help us monitor and protect the service from malicious use. An IP address is a unique identifier for your computer or other access device. We also collect and retain some management information about the performance of the service itself, such as the time taken for each transaction or system availability. This information does not identify you personally and is used to monitor and improve the service provided.
You may be invited to provide feedback on the service. You can decide if you want to participate, this does not identify you personally and is only used to improve the service provided.
Where your data is stored
We store your data on secure cloud servers in the
European Economic Area (EEA)
.
How we use your data
NHS Digital uses your personal data to:
identify who you are so that your choice is correctly allocated to your record on our secure data store
make a record of your choice against your NHS number in our secure data store apply your choice on data releases that we make to others
provide a service to enable other organisations to apply your choice
produce statistics on how many people have chosen to stop sharing their information, some analysis of their age and geographical spread and how this changes over time. This will be done in a way that does not identify you
NHS Digital may contact you directly about the choice you make if there are significant changes to the service or if it is withdrawn.
Our legal basis for processing this data
NHS Digital has been instructed by the Department of Health and Social Care, through a document called a Direction, to provide this service. A Direction is a legally binding document.
Directions are published on the NHS Digital website
. This means that NHS Digital is processing your personal data to meet our legal obligation to provide this service. You can choose whether you want to use this service and can change your mind at any time.
How long we keep this information for?
Once you make a choice, the decision you make is not time limited and does not change unless you take action to change it. Your choice continues to apply after you have died. We will continue to uphold the choice you make against your NHS number in our secure data store until instructed to stop running the service by the Department of Health and Social Care.
A choice made by a parent/guardian on behalf of a child remains in place until:
the young person changes it once they reach the age of 13
the parent/guardian changes it (only if the child is under 13)
In line with our records management policy, we retain the audit information for a minimum of 8 years to enable us to monitor and report on the use of the service. We retain the “by post” documentation for 3 months.
How to view and change your choice
You can check and change the choice you make at any time. This can be done through the 'Choose if data from your health records is shared for research and planning' service or by calling the telephone helpline on 0300 303 5678. (Open: 9am to 5pm Monday to Friday - excluding bank holidays).
You'll need to confirm who you are every time you want to access or change your decision.
If you have been assigned a new NHS number because of a
data quality incident
or a
change to identity
, data linked to your previous NHS number might still be used for research and planning.
Contact us
if you do not want your confidential patient information linked to your previous NHS number to be used for research and planning.
You do not need to contact us if you have previously set a national data opt-out against your previous NHS number.
Who we share your data with
We use data processors who are third parties who provide elements of services for us. This includes answering telephone calls, emails and dealing with forms relating to opt-outs, and registering those opt-outs where requested to do so. We have contracts in place with our data processors. This means that they cannot do anything with your personal information unless we have instructed them to do it. They will not share your personal information with any organisation apart from us. They will hold it securely and retain it for the period we instruct.
In order for other health and care organisations to respect your choice, NHS Digital will provide access to the list of NHS numbers of those who have chosen not to allow their data to be used beyond their individual care and treatment. This data will only be used for the purposes of applying the choice you make.
How to get further information
Patient information
If you wish to make a choice, or to view or change your existing choice, visit the
'Choose if data from your health records is shared for research and planning' website
. Alternatively, you can call us on 0300 303 5678.
Health and care staff information
Health and care staff can find more information on the
national data opt-out website
. This includes detailed guidance on policy, and resources for staff and patients.
Data collection and processing
More information about NHS Digital's role to collect, process and protect health and care information and
how we meet our legal obligations can be found on the NHS Digital website
.
How to contact us
Please contact us if you have any questions about the information provided above or about the data we hold on you in relation to this service:
By phone
0300 303 5678
9am to 5pm, Monday to Friday excluding bank holidays
By email
enquiries@nhsdigital.nhs.uk
By post
National data opt-out
NHS England
PO Box 16738
Redditch
B97 9PT
Make a complaint
If you wish to raise a complaint concerning NHS Digital's processing of your personal data, visit
our feedback and complaints webpage
or contact us.
The NHS Digital Data Protection Officer can be contacted by telephone, email or post.
By phone
0300 303 5678
9am to 5pm, Monday to Friday excluding bank holidays
By email
enquiries@nhsdigital.nhs.uk
By post
National data opt-out
NHS England
PO Box 16738
Redditch
B97 9PT
You have the right to raise a concern with the ICO at any time:
Information Commissioner's Office
, Wycliffe House Water Lane, Wilmslow, SK9 5AF.
https://ico.org.uk/
Page contents
Contents
Where you have a choice
When your choice does not apply
When your choice will be applied
How your data is processed to register and apply your choice
Accessing the service
Information we store
Where your data is stored
How we use your data
How to view and change your choice
Who we share your data with
How to get further information
How to contact us
Make a complaint
Sub-policy 3
https://www.nhs.uk/our-policies/privacy-policy/:
Cookies on the NHS website
We've put some small files called cookies on your device to make our site work.
We'd also like to use analytics cookies. These collect feedback and send information about how our site is used to services called Adobe Analytics, Adobe Target, Qualtrics Feedback and Google Analytics. We use this information to improve our site.
Let us know if this is OK. We'll use a cookie to save your choice. You can
read more about our cookies
before you choose.
I'm OK with analytics cookies
Do not use analytics cookies
You can change your cookie settings at any time using our
cookies page
.
Skip to main content
Home
Our policies
Back to
Our policies
Your privacy on the NHS website
Our privacy policy
Your privacy is important to us. This privacy policy covers what we collect and how we use, disclose, transfer and store your information.
What information do we collect when you use the NHS website?
When you use the NHS website, we use various technologies to collect information automatically – such as your IP address. This is commonplace across all internet services to enable the investigation of issues such as service availability and the identification of malicious use. This information is then kept in our internet access logs.
We also collect some personal information directly – for example, when you actively submit details like your postcode to find nearby services.
When you log in to the NHS website, you are logging in to your NHS account. By using your NHS account, you are accepting the
NHS account terms and conditions
, including the
NHS account privacy policy
and the
NHS account cookies policy
. These will apply while you are using services within your NHS account.
How do we use the information we collect about you?
We analyse information to see what is most effective about our website and associated services to help us identify ways to improve it and to make it more effective. We may also use information for other purposes, which we would describe to you at the point when we collect the information.
Cookies
Our website uses cookies. These are small files saved on your phone, tablet or computer when you visit a website. They store information about how you use the website, such as the pages you visit.
The law states that we can store cookies on your device if they are strictly necessary for the operation of this site. For all other types of cookies we need your permission before we can use them on your device.
You can
choose which cookies we use
.
Video content
The NHS website video content – whether viewed on the website, in emails or embedded in third-party sites – are streamed to users by a third-party company, Brightcove.
See the
Brightcove privacy policy
for more information about how they collect and use data about viewers of our videos.
Email subscriptions
If you sign up for one of our email subscription services, we will hold the information you submitted (such as your email address) for as long as we are providing you services.
If you do not access the services provided by us, for instance you do not open or click through one of the emails for more than a year, we will send you an email asking you to confirm that you wish to continue receiving our emails. If you do not respond to this email within 1 month we will unsubscribe you.
We will remove all personal information we hold relating to you, which you registered with us, within 6 months of you unsubscribing from the site. We hold this information for a further 6 months following unsubscription, as we may need to use it for statistical analysis or if you choose to resubscribe. Be assured that if you unsubscribe you will not receive further information from us.
NHS website enquiries
If you contact the NHS website with an enquiry, such as a question about our content, you may be contacted to provide feedback on how we managed your enquiry.
We will hold the information you provide us for as long as necessary to support the service we are providing you, for example so we can continue to provide assistance or resolve an ongoing issue.
If no communication has been made in over 12 months and the information is not required to resolve an ongoing issue, then all communication and any personal information will be deleted. Non-personal information, such as how long your enquiry was open for or the part of the website you were using, will remain. This is to allow for reporting over a period greater than 12 months.
Information is kept for 12 months to allow for trend analysis, identifying reoccurring issues and understanding common issues.
If we have determined that the information supplied contains personal information that we do not need to hold to provide assistance, we will endeavour to remove this information sooner.
Our interactive tools
We produce several interactive tools that can help you learn more about your health. For example, our Heart Age tool can help you find out how healthy your heart is.
As well as appearing on the NHS website, these tools can be used on other (third-party) sites.
If you turn on cookies that measure website use (on our
cookies page
), use of our tools on third-party sites will be tracked. No personal data is collected by these tools.
Information gathered by us includes your IP address, the page a tool is used on, and how many times it is used. In some cases, tracking is used to show user progress through a tool. This information will not be shared with third parties. All our tools store the number of times a user has visited the tool. Some tools also store information about how far you got through a tool, so you do not have to restart the tool if you use it again.
Some tools, such as the Heart Age tool, allow input of date of birth or postcode, which are converted to age and deprivation score.
Third-party services
If you turn on cookies that measure website use (on our
cookies page
) we may use the following services on the NHS website:
New Relic provides information on how well our site is working
Adobe Analytics, Google Analytics and Hotjar collect information about how you use our website, to help us make it better
Hotjar and Qualtrics survey tools are used to ask you questions to help us make the website better. These surveys may collect both personal data and data that cannot identify you (anonymised data). You will be reminded of specific details when we collect this data and your rights under this policy and legislation are not affected
For more information about how these services process your data, see:
New Relic privacy policy
Adobe Analytics privacy policy
Google Analytics privacy policy
Hotjar privacy policy
Qualtrics privacy policy
Syndication
We offer a free syndication service that enables partner organisations to pull content from the NHS website via an application programming interface (API) and display it on their website, app or service.
In line with the syndication standard licence agreement, we require personal information of those using this service for contractual purposes. We use the data to inform subscribers of changes to functionality, structure or features within the syndicated content, or if there is a breach of the agreement. We also use subscriber's personal data to feed into internal reports, which identify active callers of the API alongside their usage.
While an active subscriber is receiving syndicated content we will continue to store their personal data. We will carry out an annual review to identify users who are inactive and who do not want to continue to use the service. We will close accounts for these users.
A user can also remove their own account without admin assistance via the API developer portal.
Once an account has been closed by either the user or an admin, we will no longer store their data.
Service finders
The website provides a number of service finders to assist you in finding health services near you. While we do not capture any specific information about you as part of this service, the searches, including postcode and other personal information, are saved in our logs and analytics tools. Ideally we would only use part postcodes but this renders the searches ineffectual in rural areas.
Ratings and reviews
User ratings and reviews are moderated by a service called Thornacre. They will receive details of any comments you make and the name and email address you submit.
See the
privacy policy on the Thornacre website
to find out how they process your information.
We also syndicate published ratings and reviews to partner websites, apps or services that adhere to the syndication standard licence terms. We do not pass your email address to our syndication partners.
General data services
We process and publish data in directories on NHS.UK from data aggregators and professional bodies – for example, the
British Association for Counselling and Psychotherapy (BACP)
. This is to provide information to the public about health-related services.
Profile Information Management System (PIMS)
PIMS is used by staff working within dental practices, general practices, pharmacies, opticians, NHS Trusts and social care providers to enter service information on the NHS website so that it can be displayed on the website and syndicated to third parties.
If you are a PIMS profile editor, we collect personal data from you on registration. The personal data that we collect includes your name, email address, organisation name and job title. We use your personal data to provide the PIMS service and to communicate with you by email for PIMS service related purposes. Occasionally we may contact you for research purposes with the objective of improving the PIMS service or the service information that we provide on the NHS website.
PIMS enables you to add staff information on to your service profile(s). Before doing so, you need to ensure that you acquire and record their consent unless the information is already in the public domain (for example, published on your corporate website or included in a professional body medical register).
Social media
We utilise the following social media platforms to interact with our users:
Facebook (incorporating Instagram)
Twitter
YouTube
How the NHS website collects and stores your data
If you choose to interact with us on social media, we may receive some personally identifiable data about you, which is supplied by the channel you are using (for example, Facebook, Twitter or YouTube). This may include:
name
social media handles (such as Twitter account name)
location history (where you are contacting us from)
images (such as your profile picture)
We will process and store your data in accordance with the terms and conditions and privacy policy of the platform in question. You should be aware that your use of these platforms is governed by the terms and conditions agreed between you and the platform, rather than the NHS website.
We may use social media management tools (such as Hootsuite) to help deliver elements of our service to you. Any personally identifiable data processed using these tools is supplied by the platforms we use, in accordance with their terms and conditions.
We will not remove, duplicate or transfer your personal data from or between any of the social platforms that we use, except for when you give us explicit permission to do so or when we believe that we need to in order to respond to an urgent risk to health.
For example, if you interact with us in a way that raises serious concerns about your mental health, we may share your personal details with local NHS services to ensure that you are offered appropriate support.
You should be aware that social networks may control some of the data associated with interactions between you (the user) and us (the NHS website) on their platforms. For example, we will be able to delete our own records of a private message conversation if you request us to do so, but social networks may store a copy of this conversation that we are unable to access.
We would recommend using the privacy tools built in to the social networks in question to ensure you are able to exercise your rights appropriately.
Understanding how social networks use your data
Social networks use information about your online activity to build a profile of you. This data is then used (anonymously) to send you targeted adverts across various digital platforms.
You should be aware that interacting with health-related accounts such as ours may help build the profile of you that social networks maintain, and could potentially result in you receiving adverts related to health issues.
This process of collecting data for advertising purposes is not controlled by the NHS website, and we do not have access to the profiling data stored by social networks about you.
How long do we hold this information?
Unless otherwise stated, business information that falls under NHS Digital is held for a minimum of 3 years and will be subject to review. We will hold the information for as long as we are providing you services.
Do we share information?
we strive to capture the minimal amount of personal data, and only share with other organisations where the law permits us to do so or where we require and have gained your consent
we only share information with our authorised Data Processors for the sole purpose of processing the data in connection with the service we have procured from them. These processors must act at all times on our instructions as the Data Controller under the Data Protection legislation
we do not sell individuals' information
we host health information campaigns on behalf of the Department of Health and Social Care, where we are Data Processors. These campaigns may have separate privacy terms and consent requirements
before you submit any information, you will be informed why we are asking for specific information and it is up to you whether you provide it
How can you access, amend or withdraw the personal data you have given us?
To get in touch about these rights, please contact us via the Data Controller details above. We will seek to deal with your request without undue delay, and in any event within 1 month (subject to any extensions to which we are lawfully entitled).
*Please note that we may keep a record of your communications to help us resolve any issues that you raise.
Right to object
if we are using your data because we have a legal basis to do so under the Health and Social Care Act, and you do not agree, you have the right to object. We will respond to your request within the required time frame (although we may be allowed to extend this period in certain cases). Generally, we will only disagree with you if certain limited conditions apply
this right enables you to object to us processing your personal data where we do so for one of the following reasons: (i) to enable us to perform a public task or exercise official authority; (ii) to send you direct marketing communications; and (iii) for research or analytical purposes
Right to withdraw consent
Where we have obtained your consent to process your personal data, or consent to send you information, you may withdraw your consent at any time and we will cease to carry out the particular activity that you previously consented to, unless we consider that there is an alternative reason to justify our continued processing of your data for this purpose, in which case we will inform you of this condition.
Data access requests
You may ask us to confirm what information we hold about you at any time, and request us to modify, update or delete such information. We may ask you to verify your identity and for more information about your request.
If we provide you with access to the information we hold about you, we will not charge you for this. If we refuse your request for any legitimate reason, we will always tell you the reasons for doing so.
Right to remove
In certain situations, you have the right to request us to "remove" your personal data. We will respond to your request within the agreed timeframe (although we may be allowed to extend this period in certain cases) and will only disagree with you if certain limited conditions apply.
If we do agree to your request, we will delete your data but will generally assume that you would prefer us to keep a note of your name on a register of individuals who would prefer not to be contacted. That way, we will minimise the chances of you being contacted in the future where your data is collected in unconnected circumstances. If you would prefer us not to do this, you are free to say so.
Normally, the information must meet one of the following criteria:
the data is no longer necessary for the purpose for which we originally collected and/or processed it
where previously given, you have withdrawn your consent to us processing your data, and there is no other valid reason for us to continue processing
the data has been processed unlawfully (i.e. in a manner that does not comply with existing Data Protection regulations)
it is necessary for the data to be deleted for us to comply with our legal obligations as a data controller
We would only be entitled to refuse to comply with your request for one of the following reasons:
to exercise the right of freedom of expression and information
to comply with legal obligations or for the performance of a public interest task or exercise of official authority
for public health reasons in the public interest
for archival, research or statistical purposes
to exercise or defend a legal claim. When complying with a valid request for the removal of data, we will take all reasonably practicable steps to delete the relevant data
Right to restrict processing
You have the right to request that we restrict our processing of your personal data in certain circumstances.
This means that we can only continue to store your data and will not be able to carry out any further processing activities with it until either: (i) one of the circumstances listed below is resolved; (ii) you consent; or (iii) further processing is necessary for either the establishment, exercise or defence of legal claims, the protection of the rights of another individual, or reasons of important public interest.
The circumstances in which you are entitled to request that we restrict the processing of your personal data are:
where you dispute the accuracy of the personal data that we are processing about you. In this case, our processing of your personal data will be restricted for the period during which the accuracy of the data is verified
where you object to our processing of your personal data for our legitimate interests. Here, you can request that the data be restricted while we verify our grounds for processing your personal data
where our processing of your data is unlawful, but you would prefer us to restrict our processing of it rather than erasing it
where we have no further need to process your personal data but you require the data to establish, exercise or defend legal claims
If we have shared your personal data with third parties, we will notify them about the restricted processing unless this is impossible or involves disproportionate effort. We will, of course, notify you before lifting any restriction on processing your personal data.
Right to rectification
You also have the right to request that we rectify any inaccurate or incomplete personal data that we hold about you. If we have shared this personal data with third parties, we will notify them about the rectification unless this is impossible or involves disproportionate effort.
Where appropriate, we will also tell you which third parties we have disclosed the inaccurate or incomplete personal data to. Where we think that it is reasonable for us not to comply with your request, we will explain our reasons for this decision.
Purpose and legal basis for processing
NHS Digital operates the NHS website as directed by the Electronic Prescription Service, Health and Social Care Network, N3, NHS e-Referral Service, Secondary Use Service (SUS), Spine 2 (Named Programmes) Directions 2016 under the powers of sections 254(1) and (6), 274(2), 304(9) and (10) of the Health and Social Care Act 2012.
This direction supplements the Health and Social Care Information Centre (Systems Delivery Functions for the NHS website and Additional Systems Delivery Functions for the NHS website) Directions 2013.
Keeping information secure
We invest significant resources to protect your personal information, from loss, misuse, unauthorised access, modification or disclosure. However, no internet-based site can be 100% secure and so we cannot be held responsible for unauthorised or unintended access that is beyond our control.
The NHS website Data Controller
the Health and Social Care Information Centre (known as NHS Digital) is the Data Controller for the NHS website
the Data Protection Officer is Kevin Willis
find out
how NHS Digital looks after your health and care information
if there are any queries regarding this privacy policy, you may contact us using the information below:
Information Governance Compliance Team
NHS Digital
7 and 8 Wellington Place
Leeds, West Yorkshire
LS1 4AP
or email
enquiries@nhsdigital.nhs.uk
in some cases, the NHS website is acting as a Data Processor on behalf of another Data Controller, for example the Department of Health and Social Care health campaigns
we will process your data in accordance with the Data Protection regulations in force in the UK at the time
you are entitled to know whether we hold information about you and, if we do, to have access to that information and require it to be corrected if it is inaccurate
you also have the right to lodge a complaint with the Information Commissioner's Office.
Contact the ICO
More in
Our policies
Content policy
Linking from the NHS website
Terms and conditions
Your privacy on the NHS website
Cookies on the NHS website
Reviews policy
Requests for research support
Page last reviewed: 12 November 2018
Next review due: 12 November 2021
Sub-policy 4
https://111.nhs.uk/Help/Privacy:
Skip to main content
Privacy statement
This privacy policy tells you what information we collect when you use
        the NHS 111 online service. It also tells you:
how we use your information
who we share your information with
how we keep your data secure
about your rights to see or change information held about you
Information that can identify you
We’ll always tell you when we are collecting this information.
When you use the service we collect:
your postcode - to get you help in the right location
your age and sex - so we ask the right medical questions
When you answer questions about your symptoms (called ‘triage’) we collect
        the answers. We also collect the symptom you tell us about and the outcome
        (called ‘disposition’) you reach. This is so we can recommend the right
        outcome for your health needs.
If you would like to be referred to a healthcare provider after the triage
        we will ask for your:
first name
last name
address and postcode
telephone number
If you’re using the service on behalf of someone else we’ll ask for their
        details. We need this personal information as we can’t give you the
        healthcare service you have asked for without it.
We use the personal information you’ve given us to carry out a 'personal demographic service (PDS)' check. This means we try and find your NHS number and your GP details. Having your NHS number means the healthcare professional you’re referred to can see information about you, such as details about any care plan you might be on. This makes it easier for them to give you the right help.
We will pass this personal information and the advice you've been given to a healthcare professional. The healthcare professional may
        work outside the NHS (for example, a pharmacist, or dentist), but will have been commissioned by the NHS to provide services for 111.
        By agreeing to be referred to a healthcare professional you consent to the sharing of your personal information in a way which respects
        the Common Law Duty of Confidentiality. We’ll also store the information securely for 8 years for clinical audit purposes only.
We collect details from your 111 online visit and link it to data from the Hospital Episode Statistics (HES) database. We collect
        your age, sex, date and time of your 111 online visit, the first part of your postcode, the answers to questions we asked
        and your NHS number (if it’s been used).
The data will be linked to any recent A&E visit or hospital admission at NHS hospitals in England. After the data is linked and
        before it’s used for analysis, the data will be fully anonymised so that you cannot be identified.
If you’re advised to go to another service, we may send your details on to that service. We send your personal information,
        including your NHS number, and the answers to the questions you gave when using 111 online.
If you choose to get an email or text message confirming that your details have been sent to the receiving service,
        we use a secure government service called GOV.UK Notify. You can read about how your data is kept secure in the
GOV.UK Notify privacy notice.
(opens in a new tab)
We might ask you to complete a survey when you’ve finished using the
        service. The survey is run by 111 online using a tool provided
        by a third party (Qualtrics). The survey will include some information about how you used 111 online
        and what outcome you got. With your permission only, we may link your
        survey responses to the information you entered in the website. This
        information helps us improve the service for future users.
We might also ask for your email so we can send you a survey later to ask
        you about what happened after you used 111 online.
Using 111 online in the NHS App
You can access 111 online on the NHS App using your NHS login details.
If you are signed in to the NHS App using NHS login, we will ask your permission to share your NHS login information with our service. This allows us to fill in some personal details for you, such as your name and date of birth.
We will not use your NHS login information for any other purposes. You can only share your NHS login information if you have proved your identity to NHS login.
You can choose not to share your NHS login information with 111 online, but you will need to enter your information yourself whilst using our service.
For more information, see the
NHS login privacy notice
(opens in a new tab)
and
terms and conditions
(opens in a new tab)
.
Other information we may collect
You can leave feedback on most pages of the website. Feedback on pages is
        collected anonymously. We don’t look at it all the time and are unable to
        give you a response. If you need someone to get back to you please call 111.
We also collect anonymous information about how you reached the website,
        for example details of your web browser and part of your IP address. This is so
        we can improve the service for future users.
Keeping your personal data secure
We convert your data into secure code (encrypt it) and store it on secure
        servers in England. A partner organisation is providing hosting services
        but has no say in how the information is used. There are no legal ways for
        their employees to see the data, only approved people in the NHS 111 online
        development team can see it.
If you choose to be referred to a healthcare service, we add your personal
        details to the answers you have given to create a clinical record. We send
        this securely to the healthcare service that you select, which might be a
        service commissioned by the NHS like a pharmacy or dentist. By agreeing to
        be referred to a healthcare professional you agree to this.
NHS England keeps referral information that can identify you for 8 years for clinical audit purposes only. It’s then securely destroyed.
8 years is the amount of time information is kept for clinical audit purposes in the NHS.
If you shared your email with us as part of your survey answers it will be deleted after 2 years. At that point you can't be identified in the survey data.
Links to other websites
This privacy policy only applies to this website and doesn't cover other
        websites that we link to. If you go to another website from this one, read
        the privacy policy on that website to find out what it does with your
        information.
Data sharing
Providing care
We will pass your answers and personal details to the healthcare service
        you have selected if you (or the person you are contacting us about),
        choose to be referred. This healthcare service might be outside the NHS,
        but commissioned by it.
That healthcare service may then go on to share your data with other
        healthcare providers. They will follow their own policies and data protection legislation if so.
By agreeing to be referred to another healthcare provider you are also
        agreeing that your data can be forwarded to them so they can provide
        care. If you’re contacting us on behalf of someone else you should make
        sure that person has agreed their data can be shared in this way.
Other uses of your data
NHS England will also share:
anonymous information on how the service is used with the Department of
            Health and Social Care, integrated care boards (ICBs)
            and the National Clinical Advisory Group
anonymous data with the UK Health Security Agency (UKHSA) for detecting and monitoring
            clusters of disease (syndromic surveillance). You cannot be identified from
            this data. The information is used to monitor trends and plan responses to
            outbreaks of disease, such as coronavirus (COVID-19)
anonymous information to improve the service with 111 online suppliers,
            the Department of Health and Social Care, ICBs and the
            National Clinical Advisory Group
results from user research and changes made to the service as a result of
            it with ICBs
anonymous, combined data about how 111 online is used, for inclusion in regular reports and official statistics publications.
            These can be found in
NHS England's statistics work area.
(opens in a new tab)
Legal powers
We may pass on your personal information if we’re legally obliged to do so.
If you make a claim against us, we, and other third parties such as our
        solicitors, may need to look at this information.
We won’t share your personal information with anyone else without your
        permission for any other reason.
Legal information about using and storing data
The Department of Health and Social Care has instructed NHS England to
        provide this service through a legally-binding document called a Direction.
        This means that NHS England is processing your personal data to meet our
        legal obligation to provide this service.
Articles 6 and 9 of the General Data Protection Regulation give 111 online
        a lawful basis to process personal and health data.
Your rights
National data opt out
If you don't want your confidential patient information to be used for research
        and planning, you can opt out by visiting
your NHS data matters
.
If you do opt out there are some situations where your data may still be used.
        For example, if you've given consent for your data to be used for a specific reason
        like a medical research study. You can read more
detail on what these situations might be on NHS UK
.
        Data that does not identify you may also still be used.
You can also:
find out what information we hold about you, ask us to correct it if it’s
            wrong, or delete it by emailing
enquiries@nhsdigital.nhs.uk
(for our Data Protection Officer contact
england.dpo@nhs.net
)
withdraw the permission you gave to link your survey responses and the
            information you entered in the 111 website if you also provided your
            email. You can do this at any time, by emailing
enquiries@nhsdigital.nhs.uk
contact the Information Commissioner’s Office, Wycliffe House Water Lane,
            Wilmslow SK9 5AF
ico.org.uk
if you
            want to make a complaint about how we have managed your data.
NHS England, 7-8 Wellington Place, Leeds, LS1 4AP is the Data Controller for NHS 111 online under data protection legislation. We will process your data in line with data protection legislation.
Sub-policy 5
https://www.nhs.uk/nhs-services/online-services/vaccine-record/privacy-policy/:
Cookies on the NHS website
We've put some small files called cookies on your device to make our site work.
We'd also like to use analytics cookies. These collect feedback and send information about how our site is used to services called Adobe Analytics, Adobe Target, Qualtrics Feedback and Google Analytics. We use this information to improve our site.
Let us know if this is OK. We'll use a cookie to save your choice. You can
read more about our cookies
before you choose.
I'm OK with analytics cookies
Do not use analytics cookies
You can change your cookie settings at any time using our
cookies page
.
Skip to main content
Home
NHS services
Online services
Check your COVID-19 vaccine record
Back to
Check your COVID-19 vaccine record
Check your COVID-19 vaccine record service privacy policy
About this policy
This privacy policy relates to the service through which you can “Check your COVID-19 vaccine record” (the “Service”). The Service is accessible via either the NHS App or via a website (
https://www.coronavirus-record.service.nhs.uk
). The Service is provided by NHS Digital in support of the Department of Health and Social Care's COVID-19 response.
This privacy policy explains what we do with your data if you choose to use the Service to check your COVID-19 vaccine record and what your rights are.
Note
: due to the evolving nature of COVID-19 response, it may be necessary to enhance the Service. This may include changing the way we process data and who we share it with. We will always process this in accordance with data protection laws and this privacy notice will be updated to reflect any changes to the Service.
Learn more about
coronavirus (COVID-19)
.
The Service and who we are
The Service allows a user to view a digital record of their COVID-19 vaccine history, where they have received a COVID-19 vaccination at a hospital, GP practice or vaccination centre located in England, so that they are able to understand what vaccines they have had and report adverse reactions through the Medicines and Healthcare products Regulatory Agency (MHRA)
Coronavirus Yellow Card reporting site
, which this Service provides a link to.
The information is only accessible to the data subject choosing to access it.
Once you have submitted valid credentials to NHS login and provided you are over the age of 16 then you will be verified to the highest level and logged into the Service.
Both the NHS App and NHS.UK will provide an entry route to the Service, which is a standalone service. Aside from the audit trail showing how an individual reached the Service (ie, through which route), the processing of the personal data to check your COVID-19 vaccine record is undertaken within this standalone Service.
Users who reside within any of the devolved authorities and have received a COVID-19 vaccination in England, will be able to view a digital record of their COVID-19 vaccine history if they use the service via NHS.UK.
Please note that when you access our service using your NHS login details, the identity verification services are managed by NHS Digital in our role delivering NHS login. NHS Digital is the controller for any personal information you provided to NHS Digital to get an NHS login account and verify your identity, and uses that personal information solely for that single purpose.
NHS Digital
NHS Digital was set up by the Department of Health and Social Care in April 2013 and is an executive non-departmental public body that provides national information, data and IT systems for health and care services.
Find out more about NHS Digital
.
NHS Digital has been asked by the Department of Health and Social Care to provide the Service. It also provides a public-facing help desk for user queries relating to the Service.
NHS Digital is the controller for the personal data we process, unless otherwise stated. NHS Digital has collected the COVID-19 vaccination data from NHS England, as controller of the National Immunisation Management System (NIMS) database, for the purpose of facilitating this Service.
You can contact us by post, telephone or email. More details are available
on our contact page
.
Our postal address is:
The Leeds Government Hub
7 & 8 Wellington Place
Leeds LS1 4AP
Telephone: 0300 303 5678
Email:
enquiries@nhsdigital.nhs.uk
Our Data Protection Officer
Our Data Protection Officer, whose duties include monitoring internal compliance and advising the organisation on its data protection obligations, can be contacted via
nhsdigital.dpo@nhs.net
.
Our legal basis for processing personal data
The Department of Health and Social Care on behalf of the Secretary of State has directed NHS Digital under s.254 of the Health and Social Care Act 2012 to collect and analyse data in connection with COVID-19 and set up a system to collect this data.
A copy of the Direction is published in the
COVID-19 Public Health Directions 2020 webpage
. This direction is the basis on which NHS Digital operates the "Check Your COVID-19 Vaccine Record" Service.
Our legal basis for processing your personal data under the UK General Data Protection Regulation (UK GDPR) and Data Protection Act 2018 (DPA 2018) is:
UK GDPR Article 6 (1) (c) – processing is necessary to comply with a legal obligation
UK GDPR Article 6 (1) (e) – processing is necessary for the performance of a task carried out in the public interest
UK GDPR Article 9 (2) (g) – processing is necessary for reasons of substantial public interest
UK GDPR Article 9(2)(h) – processing is necessary for the management of health systems and services
DPA 2018 – Schedule 1, Part 2, (6) (1) – Statutory and government purposes
DPA 2018 – Schedule 1, Part 1, (2) (2) (f) – Health or social care purposes
If you agree to take part in feedback or surveys about the Service, our legal basis for processing your data in this context is consent (GDPR Article 6 (1) (a)).
What information we collect about you and how it is used
The information processed for the purposes of the Service can be split into several different categories.
Details of the information and personal data falling within each of the categories where NHS Digital is the controller are set out below.
Categories of information and personal data where NHS Digital is the controller – for the Check Your COVID-19 Vaccine Record service
Category of information
Personal data
Special categories of personal data
Vaccine record data
Date and time the vaccine dose was administered, the name of vaccine, the vaccine batch, and the administering centre in England
Yes – data concerning health
NHS Digital service helpdesk information
The personal data you provide if you contact the NHS Digital helpdesk; could include information about your use of the Service
None
NHS Digital service helpdesk feedback and surveys
The personal data you provide if you provide feedback such as responding to one of our surveys
None
Service audit data
Event logs containing an NHS login ID, the event being audited and the time stamp of the event
None
Who we share your data with
If you are using the check your COVID-19 vaccine record service we do not share any of your personal data captured by the service in an identifiable form with any other party.
How NHS Digital uses your personal data and why
The processing of your personal data is necessary to provide you with the Service and ensure the functionality of the Service.
You will not be able to use the Service unless you agree to its
terms of use
and this privacy policy.
We may need to share your personal information if we are required to do so by law.
How long we keep your data for
The retention period for each category of information - for "Check Your COVID-19 Vaccination Record" service.
Category of information
Retention period
Vaccine record data
The data will be retained only for as long as is necessary for the provision of this Service and until the expiry of the COVID-19 Direction unless extended or another lawful basis applies. The COVID-19 Direction is currently in force until 31 March 2022 but will be reviewed every 6 months in consultation with SoS, DHSC and NHSX. It will also be retained in accordance with the Records Management Code of Practice for Health and Social Care 2016 and NHS Digital’s Records Management Policy
Service audit data
6 years after the audit event occurred
NHS Digital service helpdesk information
12 months
NHS Digital service helpdesk feedback and surveys
12 months
Where this data is stored and processed
We only store and process your personal data within the UK.
Your rights over your personal data
We respect your rights to access and control the personal data that we hold about you, as required by data protection legislation. This includes the right to:
be informed
get access to it
rectify or change it
restrict or stop processing it
You can exercise these rights at any time by emailing us on
enquiries@nhsdigital.nhs.uk
If you wish to make a complaint about how we have managed your data, contact the Regulator, the
Information Commissioner's Office
:
Information Commissioner's Office
Wycliffe House
Water Lane
Wilmslow WSK9 5AF
Points of contact for queries
If you have any questions about the functionality of this Service (either in the NHS App or website version) please use our
feedback and complaints
page in the first instance.
If you have any questions about or want to request any amendments to your COVID-19 vaccine data, please phone 119 or, if calling from outside the UK, phone +44 119.
If you have any questions about your health you should contact a GP or an other healthcare professional directly, or phone NHS 111 by calling 111 from any landline or mobile phone free of charge.
If you have any queries in relation to the use of your personal data within the Service, you can contact our Data Protection Officer at
nhsdigital.dpo@nhs.net
.
Changes to the privacy policy
The terms of our privacy policy may change from time to time. Any updates to the privacy policy will be published on the Service website.
More in
Check your COVID-19 vaccine record
Accessibility statement for the check your COVID-19 vaccine record service
Check your COVID-19 vaccine record privacy policy
Check your COVID-19 vaccine record terms of use
Cookies on the check your COVID-19 vaccine record service
Page last reviewed: 14 May 2021
Next review due: 14 May 2024
Sub-policy 6
https://www.nhs.uk/our-policies/nbs-privacy-policy/:
Cookies on the NHS website
We've put some small files called cookies on your device to make our site work.
We'd also like to use analytics cookies. These collect feedback and send information about how our site is used to services called Adobe Analytics, Adobe Target, Qualtrics Feedback and Google Analytics. We use this information to improve our site.
Let us know if this is OK. We'll use a cookie to save your choice. You can
read more about our cookies
before you choose.
I'm OK with analytics cookies
Do not use analytics cookies
You can change your cookie settings at any time using our
cookies page
.
Skip to main content
Home
Our policies
Back to
Our policies
National Booking Service – Privacy policy
1. About this privacy notice
This privacy policy relates to the National Booking Service, which NHS England provides. It enables members of the public in England to book online appointments for COVID-19, flu and RSV vaccinations.
The booking service offers the following services:
Book or manage a COVID-19 vaccination appointment
Book or manage a free NHS flu vaccine at a pharmacy service.
Book or manage a combined COVID-19 and flu vaccination appointment
Book or manage an RSV vaccination appointment
The National Booking Service is referred to in this document as the 'Service'.
In this privacy policy, 'we' or 'us' means NHS England. 'You' or 'your' means you, a member of the public who is using the Service.
This privacy policy tells you what information NHS England collects and how it is used to provide the Service, including your rights and how to contact us.
2. The Service and who we are
The Service allows you to:
Book and manage COVID-19 vaccination appointments at vaccination, primary care, community pharmacy or hospital hub vaccination sites.
Book and manage co-administration (Covid-19 and Flu given at the same time) appointments.
Book and manage flu and RSV vaccination appointments at pharmacies.
Receive booking, reminder, and cancellation notifications via email or text.
You can take your booking confirmation message to the relevant vaccination site or pharmacy.
The Health and Social Care Information Centre, known as NHS England, operates the Service. NHS England was set up under the Health and Social Care Act 2012 (2012 Act) and is part of the NHS in England. We securely collect, analyse, and share information to improve health and social care services.
3. Our legal basis for collecting and processing your personal information
A work package was commissioned between NHS England and NHS Digital – both separate organisations at the time – to deliver the National Booking Service (NBS).
From 17 March 2020 to 30 June 2022, the COVID-19 Public Health Directions established the legal basis of the necessary data processing required to run the National Booking Service, which included special category health data.
Within the Service, data processing in both the COVID-19 and Flu services includes both personal data and special category health data, such as:
NHS Number, to identify the individual and support the management of appointments.
Vaccination eligibility by self-referral reason.
The Service undertakes lawful, fair and transparent processing of this data under the following legal basis:
Under Article 6 of the UK GDPR:
(b) Contract:
it is necessary to process this data to provide a vaccinations booking service for the general public, and without it we cannot meet the needs of citizen users by enabling them to book and manage their appointments to receive vaccinations. The Privacy Policy confirms that the processing is proportionate to the purpose and that we adhere to the principles of data protection, even where relying on the contractual necessity as a legal basis.
(e) Public task:
the processing is necessary to deliver the Service, which is in the public interest as it delivers access to free vaccination appointments as part of a national approach to safeguarding the health and well-being of citizens and providing value for money through public services.
Under Article 9 of the UK GDPR:
(2)(i) Public Health
(via reasons of public interest), the Service is a supporting element of the national vaccination approach. It was established as part of the response to a new threat to public health (i.e. the COVID-19 pandemic).
We have a policy document in place for this Service. This provides information on how we comply with the data protection principles under UK GDPR,
Separately, special permission from the Secretary of State for Health and Social Care is in place to use confidential patient information without people’s explicit consent. To diagnose, recognise trends, control, prevent, monitor and manage communicable diseases and other risks to public health.
Please note that if you access our service using your NHS login details, the identity verification and authentication service provided is managed by NHS England. NHS England is the controller for the personal information provided to NHS login. Read the NHS login’s Privacy Policy and Terms and Conditions for more details.
4. How we use your personal information and why
4.1 Checking your identity
To create your appointments, we must create a customer record using information from the Personal Demographics Service (PDS) and data you entered into the Service. The Personal Demographics Service (PDS) is the national electronic database of NHS patient details such as name, address, date of birth and NHS Number (known as demographic information).
We use the following information to check your identity against PDS:
Your NHS number
Your first name
Your surname
Your date of birth
Your home postcode
If the information you enter matches PDS, we will create a ‘customer’ record, allowing you to book and manage appointments using the Service.
4.2 Accessing our NHS vaccination record
We access your NHS vaccination record for coronavirus and flu vaccination appointments to offer suitable vaccinations that meet clinical guidelines. This allows us to check the following:
Your eligibility to book vaccination appointments. The Joint Committee for Vaccinations and Immunisations (JCVI) advises the Department of Health and Social Care on what groups of people should be prioritised for vaccinations. This is based on clinical risk factors and determines who and in what order people are invited to book a vaccination.
Your flu vaccination status – whether you have received a vaccination and when this happened,
Your COVID-19 vaccination status – whether you have received a vaccination, the type, and when this happened.
4.3 How we decide if you are a health and social care worker or an unpaid carer
We may ask whether you are a health and social care worker or a carer for vaccination appointments, as these individuals may be eligible for vaccination.
This information may be stored in your ‘customer’ record if you identify as a health or social care worker. The vaccination centre check-in staff may use this information to ask you, where appropriate, for your workplace identification.
We may also ask you if you are a carer, along with some additional questions to determine your eligibility for vaccination in line with JCVI guidance.
4.4 How we decide if you are, or think you might be pregnant
For vaccination appointments, we may ask you if you are or think you might be pregnant. We will use this information to determine your eligibility for a vaccination.
Your answer to this question may be stored in your ‘customer’ record.
4.5 How we decide if you, or people living in your home, are or have been severely immunosuppressed or are clinically at-risk
For vaccination appointments, we may ask you if you, or your household contacts, are severely immune suppressed or clinically at-risk so that we only offer you appointments for recommended vaccines. We will also use this information to decide if you are eligible for vaccination.
This information may be stored in your ‘customer’ record. This information may be used by the vaccination centre check-in staff so that they can ask you, where appropriate, for proof of status, such as a letter from your GP.
4.6 Booking appointments
For vaccination appointments, we link the vaccination appointments that you select to your ‘customer’ record.
4.7 Contacting you
The Service will ask you to enter your mobile telephone or email address to receive booking confirmations and reminders.
If you choose not to do this, the Service will ask you to enter a landline or home phone number and ask again for your mobile number or email address. This is so that a vaccination centre or pharmacy can contact you if your appointment(s) have to be rearranged or cancelled.
Providing this information is optional, but if you do not enter this information, the service will not be able to contact you if your appointment(s) is/are rearranged or cancelled. Your contact information is stored in your ‘customer’ record.
4.8 Retrieving your booking information at the vaccination centre or pharmacy
The vaccination centre or pharmacy staff can check that you have an appointment by retrieving your ‘customer’ record using your booking reference number, name, mobile phone number or email address.
They can view details of all appointments (past and future) at their vaccination centre or pharmacy. These details include your name, booking reference number, NHS number, vaccine type, appointment type and appointment time.
4.9 The NHS England Research Panel
At the end of the booking service, we will invite you to give feedback on your experience with the Service. This feedback helps us make improvements in the future.
The feedback form will allow you to join the NHS England Research Panel. As a panel member, you can participate in online surveys, one-to-one interviews, web usability tests and discussion groups. We may follow up to ask about your experience at your appointment(s).
If you opt in to the NHS England Research Panel, we will ask you to enter your name, email address and mobile telephone number. This is entirely optional, and you do not have to participate if you do not wish to. By giving us this information and clicking submit, you provide us with consent to contact you for research purposes.
4.10 Enabling pseudonymised reports to be produced
Pseudonymisation is a technique that replaces or removes information in a data set that identifies an individual. The Service will use summarised and pseudonymised data to produce operational and strategic reporting. This will enable us to understand how the Service is performing, measure the take up of the service and identify the number of users that do not attend their appointments.
5. Who do we share your personal information with
When disclosing and sharing personal data with other organisations, NHS Digital complies with the UK GDPR and the DPA 2018. Additionally, sharing identifiable health data complies with the common law duty of confidentiality.
Personal data is shared with the following:
Information regarding your appointment is shared with the vaccination centre so that they can manage the appointment.
Information regarding your coronavirus vaccination appointments is shared with the Immunisation Event Data Store (IEDS) so that the mechanism for invitations and reminders to citizens can operate correctly. NHS England commissions the IEDS and is a centralised service in England to manage invitations for vaccination.
Appointment information is sent to NHS Arden and the Greater East Midlands Commissioning Support Unit for anonymising and reporting purposes at the national level.
6. How long do we keep your personal information for
Your customer record includes the following personal information:
First name
Surname
Date of birth
NHS number
Whether you are a health worker, a social care worker, an unpaid carer, pregnant, severely immune suppressed or clinically at-risk or a household contact of someone who is severely immune suppressed or clinically at-risk.
Your appointment information: name of the vaccination centre or pharmacy and the type, date and time of your appointment(s).
We will keep your customer record and appointment information for as long as necessary for the purposes for which the data was collected and as long as the law allows. We will, therefore, regularly review whether we need to keep your personal information at least every six months.
The review will look at:
Whether it is necessary to keep your information for future vaccinations.
Whether it is necessary to keep your information for clinical safety and inquest purposes.
Whether it is necessary to keep your information for any other important or legal reasons.
Once the Service no longer requires your customer record, it will be permanently deleted.
If you opt-in to the NHS Digital Research Panel, we will keep your name and the contact information you have entered for 3 years. It will then be permanently deleted.
7. Where we store your personal information
Your personal information will be processed and stored in the United Kingdom by NHS England and ACF Technologies UK Ltd, who supply parts of the booking system.
All data held within the Service is within the UK jurisdiction as it is hosted in Microsoft cloud computing services within the UK.
If you opt in to the NHS England Research Panel, your personal information will be processed and stored in the EU by Qualtrics UK, which supplies the survey tool for the Service.
8. Your rights over your personal information
You have the following rights about your personal information under data protection law:
The right to be informed about how your personal information is being used (be informed).
The right to access personal information (get access).
The right to request the correction of inaccurate personal data (rectify or change).
The right to request the erasure of your personal information in certain limited circumstances (erase or remove).
The right to restrict the processing of your data where certain requirements are met (limit or stop processing).
The right to object to processing your personal information in certain circumstances (object to processing or use).
The right to request that elements of your data be transferred to you or another service provider in certain circumstances (move, copy or transfer).
The right to object to specific automated decision-making processes using your personal information (know if a computer rather than a person made a decision).
The right to raise a concern with NHS Digital and the Information Commissioner's Office at any time (raise a problem).
More information about your legal rights can be found on the Information Commissioner's website.
Please note that some of these rights do not apply to the processing of your personal information by us through this Service. This is because there are certain circumstances where your rights will not apply. The rights that apply to the personal information we process as part of this Service are in the summary form below.
9. Summary of your rights
Summary of your rights over your personal information processed by the Service:
The right to be informed. This privacy statement describes what personal data we collect for the Service and how it is used.
The right of access. You can contact the NHS England service centre to request access to your personal information. They can be reached at 0300 311 22 33 or by email (england.contactus@nhs.net ). Our customer service centre is open from 9am to 5pm, Monday to Friday, except on public holidays.
The right to rectification. Contact the NHS England service centre for corrections to your personal information.
The right to erasure (“right to be forgotten”). Your ‘customer’ record and booking details will be deleted as per section 6. You can contact the NHS England service centre to request the deletion of your personal information.
The right to restriction of the processing. Requests to restrict processing need to be made to the customer service centre. Any requests to restrict processing by the Personal Demographics Service would be passed to the relevant team in NHS England.
The right to data portability. This does not apply to this Service.
The right to object. Please contact the NHS England service centre to object to your data being collected and processed. The Service will analyse the request and respond as required by law.
The right not to be subject to automated decision-making. This does not apply to this Service.
The right to withdraw consent. You have the right to withdraw the permission to be contacted by the Service for booking confirmations and if your appointments have to be cancelled. Changes to consent should be directed to the NHS England service centre.
The right to complain. You can make a complaint to the NHS England service centre. Any complaints about any related services will be passed to the relevant teams. The Service will analyse the request responded to as required by law. You can complain to NHS England and the Information Commissioners Office (ICO) using the contact information below.
10. Contact us
If you have any queries about using your personal information in connection with the Service or want to exercise any of your rights above, please get in touch by emailing england.contactus@nhs.net
Our Data Protection Officer is Jon Moore, whose duties include monitoring internal compliance and advising the organisation on its data protection obligations. You can contact him at england.contactus@nhs.net
11. Contact the Information Commissioner
If we are unable to resolve any queries or concerns about the use of your personal information in connection with the Service, you can raise your concern with the Information Commissioner. You can contact the Information Commissioner’s Office:
using the online Contact Us service
by calling 0303 123 1113
by writing to the Information Commissioner's Office, Wycliffe House, Water Lane, Wilmslow, Cheshire, SK9 5AF
11.1 Changes to this notice
The terms of our privacy policy may change from time to time. Any updates to the privacy policy will be published on
www.nhs.uk
Page last reviewed: 28 November 2022
Next review due: 28 November 2025
Sub-policy 7
https://digital.nhs.uk/services/e-referral-service/document-library/privacy-statement---nhs-e-referral-service:
digital.nhs.uk
Verifying you are human. This may take a few seconds.
digital.nhs.uk needs to review the security of your connection before proceeding.
Verification successful
Waiting for digital.nhs.uk to respond...
Enable JavaScript and cookies to continue
Sub-policy 8
https://www.england.nhs.uk/contact-us/privacy-notice/how-we-use-your-information/our-services/nhs-wayfinder-services/:
Skip to main content
Cookies on the NHS England website
We’ve put some small files called cookies on your device to make our site work.
We’d also like to use analytics cookies. These send information about how our site is used to a service called Google Analytics. We use this information to improve our site.
Let us know if this is OK. We’ll use a cookie to save your choice. You can
read more about our cookies
before you choose.
Change my preferences
I'm OK with analytics cookies
Home
News
Publications
Statistics
Blogs
Events
Contact us
Contact NHS England
Privacy notice
NHS England merger with NHS Digital and Health Education England
Artificial Intelligence Deployment Platform Pilot
Data analytics
How to access your personal information or make a request in relation to other rights
What is a privacy notice?
Former NHS Improvement functions
NHS England as a data controller
How we use your information
NHS England, NHS Digital and Health Education England merger
Coronavirus (COVID-19) response
Our services
Cancer Programme Pilots Evaluation (England): transparency notice
Providing online consultation services
Patients registered with GP practices
Primary care commissioning
Specialised commissioning
Armed forces and families health care
Health and justice
Public health
Secondary care dental
Continuing Health Care – independent review panels
Individual requests for funding
Payment for living kidney donation
Data services for commissioners
Primary Care Support England
Legacy records
Evaluation of the Targeted Lung Health Check programme
Evaluation of the Rapid Diagnostic Centres
NHS Wayfinder services
Those taking part in the Community Pharmacy Consultation Service for people attending Emergency and Urgent Care with a minor illness
Maternity and Neonatal Independent Senior Advocacy (MNISA) – privacy notice
Health needs assessment for patients with Thalessimia
Public and partners
Safety and quality
Health care professionals
Our workforce
How the NHS and care services use your information: the National Data Opt-Out
National vaccination programmes
NHS Genomic Medicine Service
Home
Contact NHS England
Privacy notice
How we use your information
Our services
NHS Wayfinder services
About this privacy policy
NHS England provides the Wayfinder services that enable people and carers to access information about their secondary care referrals and their elective care via the NHS account (either the NHS App or nhs.co.uk).
This privacy policy explains how NHS England and other organisations may use your data for this purpose.
Data Controller’s Contact Details
The Secretary of State has issued directions to NHS England to deliver Wayfinder. The legal direction is titled Wayfinder Services Directions 2023, dated 5 July 2023.
NHS England are joint controller with the Secretary of State for the data we need to provide the Wayfinder services unless otherwise stated.
NHS England are also joint controller, with the Secretary of State for the NHS App.
Please visit the
NHS App webpage
for further details.
Please visit the
NHS England website
for contact details.
Our purpose for using your data
We use your data to help you access information about secondary care referrals and your elective care via the NHS App. We will do this by integrating patient-facing systems (also known as personal health record (PHR) services) with the NHS App to provide more patient-centered care at local and national levels.
Our aims are to:
Create a better experience for you, so you have more control over your care.
Be able to give more people more access.
Be able to give you information relevant and tailored to you.
Reduce the number of paper letters sent by post.
Reduce our carbon footprint.
Reduce waiting times and decrease waiting lists
Make a positive contribution towards the Elective Care Backlog Recovery Programme and its goals.
In using your data, we will be able to do the following in the NHS App, both in mobile and desktop formats:
Present you with information on:
referrals and their status
future and historical hospital appointments
clinical documents including things such as appointment letters, outcome letters, discharge summaries, etc.
questionnaires relevant to your hospital care
patient test results and other such patient-facing clinical data sources
wait list information and average wait times.
Send you notifications and messages regarding the above information.
Enable you to access
e-RS, to book your initial outpatient appointment
patient-facing systems, to book, change and cancel appointments.
Provide a way for you to provide feedback.
Provide a way to collect and analyse data to improve services.
This service does not include profiling or any automated decision making.
Where do we get information from?
We collect data from NHS trusts via their patient facing systems as well as other areas of NHS England as explained below:
Role
What is it?
Data controller
Patient-facing system
This enables you to manage your appointments, view important documents and complete questionnaires.
Trusts
e-RS
(Electronic Records Service)
National e-Referrals Service provides information about your referrals and appointments. Integrated with aggregator for appointment data and allows deep links into existing manage your referral functionality
NHS England
Waiting list minimum data
set (WLMDS)
Wait time data source system managed by NHS North of England Commissioning Support.
Wait time data source system, processing anonymous WLMDS data in order to return average wait time information per speciality in each trust.
Collates and processes latest waiting list data provided by trusts, making it available to consume and surface wait time information to patients within the NHS App.
Data provided at patient level (NHS number) enabling patient to be identified to surface relevant average waiting time information.
NHS England
Data we collect about you
Data Categories
Why do we need this?
Personal data
NHS number
Your NHS number is part of your personal medical record and is used for matching and validation.
Surname
This is part of your personal medical record and is used for matching and validation.
Name
This is patient contact information that is part of your personal medical record and used to help our service desk resolve any user issues.
Date of Birth
This is part of your personal medical record and is used for matching and validation.
Email address
This is patient contact information that is part of your personal medical record and used to help our service desk resolve any user issues.
Phone number
This is patient contact information that is part of your personal medical record and used to help our service desk resolve any user issues.
Special category data
Appointment data
For example, appointment identifier, appointment date, appointment location, appointment type/description
We need this to:
be able to present appointment information to you
help our service desk resolve any user issues.
Referral data
For example, referral identifier (UBRN), referring organisation (ODS Code and name), referral status
We need this to be able to present referral information to you.
Document data
For example, document type, document status
We need this to be able to present documents to you.
Questionnaire data
For example, questionnaire type, questionnaire status
We need this to be able to present questionnaires to you.
Patient-specific wait times data
For example, patient presence on waiting list
Required to link this data with other sources, for example, WLMDS, in order to surface average wait time data relevant to the patient (based on specific speciality, trust, etc.).
Test results
Required to surface patient clear and navigable test result information to patients.
Condition/pathway data
For example, SNOMED code for a patient’s condition
Required to enable delivery of a tailored patient experience related to their individual condition or care pathway.
Speciality
Required to deliver relevant information to patients based on the speciality.
Messages from health and care providers
For example, new appointment containing key information such as location, speciality, clinician name etc.
Required to update patients on their care and required actions. Messages processed as part of NHS App Messaging and NHS App Notification Services will persist within the NHS App repositories.
Non-personal data
Portal URL (deep link)
Required to allow patients to access Wayfinder content and features delivered via patient-facing system within NHS login-enabled experience.
Portal identifiers
For example, NHS login, eRS or patient-facing system identifiers
Required to connect together patient information across different systems via pseudonymised identifiers.
Wait times rolled-up data
Aggregated dataset (for example, for trust, speciality, procedure) required to match with patient presence on wait list (from WLMDS) to provide wait time information relevant to the patient.
Patient analytical data
For example, overall number of patient logins to Wayfinder, number of unique patient logins to Wayfinder
Data about patient interaction with Wayfinder functionality gathered by a Management Information Reporting Service in order to inform business case benefits mapping, key performance indicators (KPI)/management information (MI) generation and service delivery improvement opportunities.
Will in some scenarios require processing of patient personal data (for example, NHS number) in order to generate pseudonymised data at a per patient level.
Do we share any of your information?
NHS England may share data back to the NHS trust which originally provided it, in identifiable or pseudonymised form, at the request of the NHS trust to assist in resolving any technical or quality assurance issues.
Anonymous and summarised data will be shared with NHS trusts, commissioners and policy teams at national, regional and provider level to support strategy and operational decisions and with Department of Health and Social Care and its associated bodies (NHS England, UK Health Security Agency, etc.) to support service delivery.
Anonymous and summarised data may also be shared to support research and audit.
Where do we store your information and how long do we keep it for?
We only store and process your personal data within the UK and European Economic Area (EEA).
Your information is stored as follows:
Category of information
Retention period
Personal data
Your NHS numbers is held forever in order for you to be able to access all historical trust healthcare information.
The service caches the NHS login ID token (which contains NHS Number, surname and data of birth) to support the user with a seamless authentication journey between services that will be retained in a local cache only for the duration of the user session.
Database transaction logs, record locators, infrastructure access logs, edge logs and application logs are retained within the programme; redacted logs sent to the Cyber Security Operation Centre (CSOC) in line with the CSOC retention policy.
database transaction logs – 5 years
record locators – 40 days
infrastructure access logs – 40 days
edge logs – 40 days
application logs – indefinitely
Special category data
Audit logs are retained for 5 years. All other data is pass-through, ie relayed to a subsequent target system from the sending source system.
Non-personal data
Audit logs evidencing message processing are retained for 2 years. Audit logs evidencing events processing are retained for 15 months. Audit logs evidencing access are retained for 40 days. All other data is pass-through, ie relayed to a subsequent target system from the sending source system.
Reporting data
MI reports are retained for 5 years, and MI events are retained for 5 years for analytical purposes in line with the 5 year duration of benefits forecast in the Wayfinder business case. Data will be held in pseudonymised form.
Audit logs evidencing access and review are retained for 40 days
Our legal basis for processing
The UK General Data Protection Regulation (UK GDPR) sets out the requirements on organisations who collect and process personal data from people in the UK. Where NHS England processes personal data, we need to comply with the UK GDPR.
Having a legal direction in place puts NHS England under a legal obligation to comply with this requirement and so meets Article 6(1)(c) of the UK GDPR. To deliver certain parts of the NHS App, such as when we are using your cookies, we also need your consent so meeting Article 6(1)(a) of the UK GDPR.
Your health data has extra legal protection and NHS England must also comply with
Article 9 of the UK GDPR
. To process your health data, we rely on:
Article 9(2)(g) of the UK GDPR which applies where there are “reasons of substantial public interest”. The Department of Health and Social Care has decided that it is in public interest for NHS England to provide the NHS App to the public. In addition, Schedule 1, Part 2 paragraph 6 of the Data Protection Act 2018 in relation to statutory and government purpose.
Article 9(2)(h) of the UK GDPR which applies as your NHS App supports the provision of health and social care to you. In addition, Schedule 1, Part 1 paragraph 2 of the Data Protection Act 2018 in relation to a health or social care purpose.
What are your rights?
You have a right to:
know how and why your data will be collected, processed and stored
request a copy of your personal data
correct errors or omissions in your personal data
to ask us to restrict our use of your personal data (for example, if you think it’s inaccurate and needs to be corrected).
You can exercise your rights by contacting the relevant controller.
For data held and processed by NHS England, please visit the
NHS England website
for contact details.
If you wish to exercise your rights regarding data held and processed by your hospital, please get in touch with your hospital using the contact details in the hospital’s privacy policy, published on their website.
How do you complain?
If you have any objections or complaints relating to your data, we will investigate and attempt to resolve them. We will make every reasonable effort to allow you to exercise your rights as quickly as possible and within the timescales set out in data protection laws.
You can contact our Data Protection Office at NHS England to make a complaint. You can do this by emailing
enquiries@nhsdigital.nhs.uk
or by sending a letter to:
Privacy Transparency and Ethics team
7 and 8 Wellington Place
Leeds
West Yorkshire
LS1 4AP
We ask that you try to resolve any issues with us first. However, you have a right to lodge a complaint with the Information Commissioner’s Office (ICO) at any time about our processing of your personal information. The ICO is the UK regulator for data protection and upholds information rights.
Contact the ICO
.
Contact NHS England
Privacy notice
NHS England merger with NHS Digital and Health Education England
Artificial Intelligence Deployment Platform Pilot
Data analytics
How to access your personal information or make a request in relation to other rights
What is a privacy notice?
Former NHS Improvement functions
NHS England as a data controller
How we use your information
NHS England, NHS Digital and Health Education England merger
Coronavirus (COVID-19) response
Our services
Cancer Programme Pilots Evaluation (England): transparency notice
Providing online consultation services
Patients registered with GP practices
Primary care commissioning
Specialised commissioning
Armed forces and families health care
Health and justice
Public health
Secondary care dental
Continuing Health Care – independent review panels
Individual requests for funding
Payment for living kidney donation
Data services for commissioners
Primary Care Support England
Legacy records
Evaluation of the Targeted Lung Health Check programme
Evaluation of the Rapid Diagnostic Centres
NHS Wayfinder services
Those taking part in the Community Pharmacy Consultation Service for people attending Emergency and Urgent Care with a minor illness
Maternity and Neonatal Independent Senior Advocacy (MNISA) – privacy notice
Health needs assessment for patients with Thalessimia
Public and partners
Safety and quality
Health care professionals
Our workforce
How the NHS and care services use your information: the National Data Opt-Out
National vaccination programmes
NHS Genomic Medicine Service
Cookie Control Icon
Cookie Control Close Icon
This site uses cookies to store information on your computer.
Some of these cookies are essential, while others help us to improve your experience by providing insights into how the site is being used.
Accept Recommended Settings
Necessary Cookies
Necessary cookies enable core functionality such as page navigation and access to secure areas. The website cannot function properly without these cookies, and can only be disabled by changing your browser preferences.
We'd like to set Google Analytics cookies to help us to improve our website by collecting and reporting information on how you use it. For more information on how these cookies work please see our 'Cookies page'. The cookies collect information in an anonymous form.
Analytics
On
Off
Save and Close
Sub-policy 9
https://gp-registration.nhs.uk/gpregistration/legal/privacy:
Temporary error. Please try again.
Before proceeding to your request, you need to solve a puzzle, and the puzzle requires Google Translate to be disabled. Please disable Google Translate and retry.
Let's confirm you are human
Complete the security check before continuing. This step verifies that you are not a bot, which helps to protect your account and prevent spam.
Begin
العربية
Deutsch
English
Español
Français
Italiano
日本語
Nederlands
Português
Türkçe
中文
JavaScript is disabled
In order to continue, you need to verify that you're not a robot by solving a CAPTCHA puzzle.
         The CAPTCHA puzzle requires JavaScript. Enable JavaScript and then reload the page.
Sub-policy 10
https://digital.nhs.uk/services/electronic-prescription-service/transparency-notice:
digital.nhs.uk
Verifying you are human. This may take a few seconds.
digital.nhs.uk needs to review the security of your connection before proceeding.
Verification successful
Waiting for digital.nhs.uk to respond...
Enable JavaScript and cookies to continue
Sub-policy 11
https://www.nhs.uk/nhs-services/gps/gp-services-for-someone-else-proxy-access/proxy-application-service/privacy-policy/:
Cookies on the NHS website
We've put some small files called cookies on your device to make our site work.
We'd also like to use analytics cookies. These collect feedback and send information about how our site is used to services called Adobe Analytics, Adobe Target, Qualtrics Feedback and Google Analytics. We use this information to improve our site.
Let us know if this is OK. We'll use a cookie to save your choice. You can
read more about our cookies
before you choose.
I'm OK with analytics cookies
Do not use analytics cookies
You can change your cookie settings at any time using our
cookies page
.
Skip to main content
Home
NHS services
GPs
Accessing GP services for someone else, with proxy access
Apply to manage health services for others
Back to
Apply to manage health services for others
Proxy application service - privacy policy
-
Version 6, 27 November 2025
This service is also known as Manage health services for others.
This update reflects a change in our legal responsibilities to process personal data, in line with the
National Proxy Service Directions 2025 - NHS England Digital
.
1. How we use your personal data
This privacy policy explains how we use your personal data when you use the Proxy application service. You can use this NHS App service to apply to give someone access to your health services, for example managing appointments, prescriptions or medical information, or get access to someone else's services.
This service is available in the NHS App.
You should read this policy alongside the
terms of use
for this service.
2. Terms we use in this policy
You may find it helpful to understand these terms when reading this policy.
Data is "processed" when any action is taken with it. For example, when it is collected or reviewed.
A "controller" is an organisation or person that decides what data is processed. They also decide how and why this needs to be done. They are legally responsible for that data.
A controller may appoint a "processor". This is another organisation or person that processes data under the instruction of the controller.
A processor may also sub-contract some of its data processing activities to another organisation under a written contract.  This other organisation is a "sub-processor".
"Special category data" is personal information that has more legal protection, including data about your health.
You can find out more about these terms on the
Information Commissioner's Office website
.
3. About the Proxy application service
This service is provided by
NHS England
.
The Proxy application service can be used by:
a patient aged 16 or over applying to nominate someone aged 16 or over to have access to their health services
a patient aged 16 or over applying to request access to the health services of someone else aged 16 or over
a patient aged 13 or over to apply to request access to the health services of a child they have parental responsibility for
If you are applying to get access for someone aged 11 or over, you should talk to the person you're applying about so that they are aware of the application being made.
Patients aged 11 or over have capacity to consent, unless their GP or a court agrees they do not. Capacity to consent means someone can understand enough to make an informed decision on whether they want you to have access.
The GP surgery will contact the patient to get their consent before giving you access.
If they do not have capacity to consent, because for example they have a condition like dementia or a severe learning disability that affects their understanding, the GP surgery will decide whether your access is in the best interests of the patient. They may contact you for more information, look at medical records or speak to the patient when they are assessing your application.
4. Our role and legal basis
Under Section 254 of the Health and Social Care Act 2012 and Regulation 32, the Secretary of State has directed us to deliver the National Proxy Service to improve the quality of care people receive from the NHS.
View a copy of the National Proxy Service Directions 2025
on the NHS England website.
Therefore, our legal basis to process your personal data to provide this service is:
UK GDPR Article 6(1)(c) - processing is necessary for compliance with a legal obligation to which the controller is subject (the Directions)
UK GDPR Article 9(2)(g) - processing is necessary for reasons of substantial public interest, on the basis of domestic law which shall be proportionate to the aim pursued, respect the essence of the right to data protection and provide for suitable and specific measures to safeguard the fundamental rights and the interests of the data subject, supplemented by: Data Protection Act 2018 basis Data Protection Act 2018 (DPA 2018) Schedule 1, Part 2, paragraph 6: Statutory etc and government purposes. As we have been directed to process your data to provide the National Proxy Service.
NHS England also has functions to deliver IT and communications services to the NHS under the Sections 1, 2 and 13 of the NHS Act 2006. Where we process your data to deliver those services, our legal basis to do so is:
UK GDPR Article 6(1)(e) - processing is necessary for the performance of a task carried out in the public interest or in the exercise of official authority vested in the controller by virtue of meeting our system delivery functions to the NHS under Sections 1, 2 and 13 of the 2006 Act
NHS England is also the "controller" for the following services which are used to provide the Proxy application service:
the
Personal Demographics Service (PDS)
which is the national electronic database of NHS patient details such as name, address, date of birth and NHS number (known as demographic information).
NHS login which provides patients with a simple, secure and re-usable way to access multiple digital health and care services.
About NHS login
.
the
NHS App
which gives you a simple and secure way to access a range of NHS services.
You can access the Proxy application service in the NHS App using your NHS login details. When you have logged into the NHS App, and you select
Apply to access services for someone else
, or
Give someone you trust access to your services
, we will ask your permission to share your NHS login information with our service.  This allows us to fill in some personal details for you, such as your NHS number and contact details.
We will not use your NHS login information for any other purposes.  You can only share your NHS login information if you have proved your identity to NHS login.
For more information, see the
NHS login privacy notice
and
terms and conditions
.
5. What data we collect
To provide the Proxy application service we need to collect or process:
Proxy application service data:
This is the data you provide to the service when you apply to give someone access to your health services or get access to someone else's health services. This may include special categories of data relating to health if you choose to provide this.
NHS App data
: including the ODS code of your GP surgery
NHS login account information:
such as your NHS number, your NHS login identity proofing level and your contact details.
Proxy application service log/audit data:
This is information collected against your session ID when you use the service, such as the time of use, actions you took using the service, and associated technical log events.
Proxy application service performance data:
Your IP address is sent to Adobe (our sub-processor) so that we can improve the service but it is not stored so users cannot be identified from this data.
Proxy application service metadata:
We keep a record of: the date and time you submitted your application; your application reference number; your NHS login identity proofing level; the checks we made to match you and the person you named in your application to your Personal Demographics Service (PDS) records including your NHS numbers, ages and the organisation code for your current GP surgery. We also record the success or failure of your application.
6. How we use your data
6.1 NHS login data
The Proxy application service uses NHS login to prove who you are to the highest level of identity verification. When we send your application to your GP surgery they know the application has come from you. The service also uses your NHS login information to find your patient record on the Personal Demographics Service (PDS) database, and to get your contact details.
6.2 Personal Demographics Service (PDS) data
The Proxy application service finds your patient record on PDS. It checks your name, NHS number, date of birth and your current GP surgery, to check you are eligible to use this service and your GP surgery is taking part in the pilot.
The service checks the information you enter about the person you name in your application. It checks either their name, date of birth, postcode, and current GP surgery, or their NHS number, date of birth and current GP surgery. This is done to check this person is eligible for this service and that you are both registered at the same GP surgery.
If you are a parent applying to get access to a child's health services, the service also checks for the existence of a verified relationship between you and the child on PDS to support GP decision-making on granting access.
The service checks for contact details to include in your application which are sent to your GP surgery, so they can process the application.
Your contact details are also used to send information about your application to you.
The contact details of the person you name in your application are used to send information about your application to them, if they are aged 16 or over.
6.3 Securely send your application to your GP surgery
The service uses NHS mail to securely send your application to your GP surgery. This includes PDS data, and data you have entered as part of your application.
6.4 Send an email and text confirmation
6.4.1 When you apply to give someone access to your health services
When you have successfully submitted your application, the service will send you a copy of the application to your email address(es) stored on NHS login and a text message about your application, using the mobile phone number stored on NHS login. This is done using GOV.UK Notify (our sub-processor).
Find out more about security on Notify
.
You will only see the information you entered as part of your application in the copy you receive. You will not see any information about the person you want to give access to.
The person you want to give access to will also receive an email about the application, and a text message, if they have this contact information stored on PDS. This email will only show your name and what services you've requested to give them access to. They will not see your contact details, or any other data retrieved from NHS login or your PDS record, in the text or email they receive.
6.4.2 When you apply to get access to an adult's health services
When you have successfully submitted your application, the service will send you and the patient a copy of the application, to the email address(es) stored on NHS login or PDS.
If a mobile phone number is found on PDS, the service will send the patient a text message, using
gov.uk Notify
.
Find out more about security on Notify
.
The patient will only see your name and the details you entered in the application. They will not see your contact details, or any other data retrieved from NHS login or PDS, in the text or email they receive.
You will only see the information you entered as part of your application in the copy you receive. You will not see any patient information retrieved from NHS login or PDS.
6.4.3 When you apply to get access to a child's health services
When you have successfully submitted your application, the service will send you a copy of the application, to the email address(es) stored on NHS login or PDS.
We do not send any information to the child you are applying about.
6.5 Service improvement, audit and troubleshooting
We look at how the service is being used to help us make it better. We store some of the information you enter, which is not identifiable, to see how people are using the service. This includes information you enter in any free text boxes.
We put small files called "analytic cookies" on to your device. These cookies are optional. The information collected includes: the type of device you used, your browser type, your operating system, the date/time you used the service and how you interacted with the service. For more information, see our
cookie policy
.
We also store technical log data for audit and troubleshooting (bug/fix) purposes and to make improvements to the service.
The personal data collected by the service will be de-identified and analysed to optimize the service and for policy developments. Information on how many people use the service and its performance will also be used to publish anonymous statistical dashboards. See log/audit data for more information.
7. How long we keep data for
Category of information and retention
Category of information
How long we keep it for and why
Proxy application service application data - non-identifiable data
We do not store any identifiable information after your application is sent to your GP surgery.
We store non-identifiable information indefinitely to track performance of the service so we can improve it.
This includes options you chose in your application, and any free text you entered.
We also store calculated age (applicant and named person) to track who is using the service.
Proxy application service analytics data - non-identifiable data
We store non-identifiable information about your use of the service indefinitely, to track performance and improve the service. This includes analytics data on the success or failure of the application, timeouts and other service performance data.
Proxy application service performance data
12 months
NHS login account information
2 years
Personal Demographics Service data - demographic information (applicant and named person)
We do not store any identifiable information after your application is sent to your GP surgery.
We store calculated age (applicant and named person) and GP surgery information to track who is using the service.
Proxy application service metadata
We do not store any identifiable information after your application is sent to your GP surgery.
We store non-identifiable information indefinitely to track performance of the service so we can improve it.
This includes options you chose in your application, and any free text you entered.
We also store calculated age (applicant and named person) to track who is using the service.
8. Where we store your data
We only store and process your personal data within the UK.
9. Personal data for which NHS England is the controller outside the scope of the Proxy application service
Category of information and its use
Category of information
How the data is used and handled
NHS login account information
See the NHS login privacy policy
NHS demographic information
Personal Demographics Service fair processing
NHS App information
See the NHS App privacy policy
10. Your rights
Data protection law provides you with a number of rights. You can exercise your rights by contacting NHS England's Data Protection Officer at
england.contactus@nhs.net
.
Right to be informed
– this privacy policy explains how we use your personal data to provide this service.
Right of access
– to get a copy of your data which we hold to provide this service, you can request this by completing a
Subject Access Request (SAR)
.
Right to rectification
– if you want to change or withdraw your application after it is completed, contact your GP surgery.
Right to restrict processing
– if you want to change or withdraw your application after it is completed, contact your GP surgery.
Right to withdraw consent
– you have the right to withdraw consent for analytical cookies to be placed on your device by selecting "Reject analytics cookies". See the NHS website
cookie policy
.
11. Who to contact with questions about your privacy
For any questions about your application data after you have submitted your application, contact your GP surgery.
Visit
NHS login privacy notice
for any questions about NHS login data.
12. Complaints
You can contact our Data Protection Officer to make a complaint:
By email
england.dpo@nhs.net
By post
Data Protection Officer
7 and 8 Wellington Place
Leeds
West Yorkshire
LS1 4AP
We ask that you try to resolve any issues with us first, although you have a right to lodge a complaint with the Information Commissioner's Office (ICO) at any time. The ICO is the UK regulator for data protection and upholds information rights.
Contact the ICO
13. Changes to the privacy policy
We may make changes to this notice. If we do, the version and date on this page will also change. Any changes to this notice will apply immediately from the date of any change.
Page last reviewed: 27 January 2025
Next review due: 27 January 2026
Sub-policy 12
https://www.nhsbt.nhs.uk/privacy/:
We add small files called cookies on your device to make our site work.   We’d also like to use additional marketing and analytics cookies that let us remember your settings and understand how people use our site. This helps us improve your experience.   Let us know if this is OK.
Accept additional cookies
Reject additional cookies
View cookies
Hi there, we see you're using
OS
, why not try our app?
Download
You are here:
Home
Privacy
Privacy...
This page outlines NHS Blood and Transplant’s (NHSBT) privacy policy. It explains your rights and gives you the information you are entitled to see under the Data Protection Act 2018 and UK General Data Protection Regulation (GDPR).
Our freedom of information and privacy
page includes information on how you can request recorded information held by NHSBT.
Hysbysiad preifatrwydd
provides a Welsh language version of our privacy policy.
Click on each section to find out more.
Who we are
NHSBT provides a blood and transplantation service to the NHS.
We look after blood donation services in England and transplant services across the UK.
This includes managing the donation, storage and transplantation of blood and blood components, organs, tissues, bone marrow and stem cells, and researching new treatments and processes.
Our work throughout the pandemic
Through-out the COVID-19 pandemic the health and care sector, including NHSBT
,
processed information at a pace and on a scale not previously seen.
We did this to ensure patient safety and protect life during unprecedented times.
In order for us to share and use information for purposes related to COVID-19, The Secretary of State for Health and Social Care issued a Control of Patient Information Regulations (COPI) 2002 notice.
This specifically enabled the health and care sector to share personal data to manage and mitigate the spread and impact of the current outbreak of COVID-19.
View the Control of Patient Information Regulations (COPI) 2002 notice
The notice was in place until the end of June 2022, and we no longer process data in this way.
Reasons and purposes for processing information
We process personal information about you so that we can continue to provide an enhanced level of service to the public for blood and organ donation.
High standards in handling personal information are of the upmost importance to us, because they help us to maintain confidence from our customers, suppliers, partners and the wider UK public.
When we handle your information, we:
make sure you know why we need it
only ask for what we need, and collect the minimal amount required
protect your information and ensure no one has access to it who should not
let you know if we are going to share it with other organisations
make sure we do not keep your information for longer than necessary
ensure you have the right to request any incorrect information be rectified
do not make your personal information available for commercial use without your consent
ensure that measures are put in place to allow appropriate consent to be obtained for holding personal information of anyone aged under 13
In addition to this, we:
value the personal information entrusted to us and make sure that we abide by the law when it comes to handling your personal information
ensure we consider security at the outset of any new project where we are planning to hold or use personal information in new ways, and to continue to review existing systems to ensure they are compliant with new laws
provide training to staff in how to handle personal information, maintain proper oversight of our information assets and respond appropriately if information is not used or protected properly.
Why we process information
We process information to enable us to:
Promote our policies, procedures and services to the public
Maintain our accounts and records and to support and manage our staff
Undertake research and development to improve patient outcomes
Provision of blood and organ donation services for patient care and treatment
We also process information to include administration of health and social care services, management and administration of land, property and residential property and undertake research.
We operate a CCTV system on our premises for the prevention crime and the safety and security of our staff and premises.
Lawful basis for processing your personal data
Paragraph 7 of Chapter 2 to the Data Protection Act 2018 says that, as a government body, NHSBT may process personal data as necessary for the effective performance of a task carried out in the public interest.
Should this provision not apply we will always identify the lawful basis on which your personal information is processed as defined by Article 6 and 9 of the UK GDPR.
NHSBT also has obligations under the Blood Safety & Quality Regulations 2005, Tissue and Cells Quality and Safety Regulations 2007 and Organ Quality and Safety Regulations 2012, to make sure that all blood donations and organ transplants are fully traceable from donor to recipient.
This is an essential requirement to deliver safe clinical care.
This may affect your individual rights, in particular your right to erasure and to be forgotten.
This is because NHSBT must keep all clinical records for 30 years if you donate to ensure traceability in line with the regulations listed above.
Where required, NHSBT will also satisfy the common law duty of confidentiality, and will define a lawful basis for the use of disclosure of the personal information that has been provided in confidence, this can include; valid informed consent; determining an overriding public interest or where there is a statutory basis or legal duty to disclose.
The information we process
We process information about our:
Customers
Employees
Suppliers and providers
Advisers, consultants, and other professional experts
Complaints and enquiries
Students on placements
Academics
Members and supporters of unions
NHS staff
Members of the public for CCTV purposes
Research applicants
Researchers
Patients and donors
Family members of donors
Who we share information with
As a Data Controller of your personal data, we may, where necessary, and in line with data protection legislation, need to share your data (and our data processors may also share information) with other organisations.
Here are some examples of types of organisations where we may, if necessary, share your data. Please note the data shared will be dependent on the type of service used within NHSBT.
Employment and recruitment agencies:
to obtain an employment reference for recruitment purposes
Current and past employers:
to verify your employment history for recruitment purposes
Suppliers and service providers:
to support the services we provide to the public
Government internal audit and other auditors as required:
to support regular audit activities and maintain scrutiny over public authority decision making and activities
Health and care organisations:
to verify clinical and non-clinical activity such as the provision of blood products and testing services for patient care and treatment
Other statutory law enforcement agencies:
to assist in any legal or fraudulent activity
Survey and research organisations:
to share your information for research purposes where you have consented to be part of a study
Government regulators:
to support organisational audit and investigations such as the Information Commissioners Office
The police:
to assist with police enquiries in line with relevant legislation
NHS England Transformation Directorate:
NHS Blood and Transplant (NHSBT) work closely with NHS England Transformation Directorate (formerly NHS Digital), which is the national provider of information data and IT systems. NHS England Transformation Directorate has legal powers under the Health and Social Care Act to disseminate data to health and social care providers, such as NHSBT, which we use for service improvement, evaluation and research. This includes:
Cryostat2 (UK):
Evaluating the effects of early high-dose cryoprecipitate
Melody:
Evaluating lateral flow immunoassays to detect SARS-CoV-2 antibody responses
Convalescent Plasma – Donation Data:
Identifying vaccination status to support treatment for COVID-19 patients and further plasma for medicines uses
Data retention
Outside of specific exemptions under specific legislation related to personal data your information shall be retained for no longer than the purposes for which it is being processed.
We comply with the
Records Management Code of Practice for 2021
.
We are required under the Blood and Safety Quality Regulations 2007 and Organ Quality and Safety Regulations 2012 to hold and process your data for at least 30 years.
This is to ensure full ensure traceability to the point of delivery to a hospital.
Your rights
The data we are collecting is your personal information and you have considerable say over what happens to it.  Depending on the legal basis for processing, you have a set of individual rights.
You can:
See what data we hold about you (right of access)
Ask us to stop using your data, but keep it on record (right to erasure)
Have some or all of your data deleted (right to deletion)
Have some of your data corrected (right to rectification)
Lodge a complaint with the Information Commissioner's Office (ICO) if you think we are not handling your data fairly or in accordance with the law
Rights of Access requests
Data Protection legislation allows you to find out the personal information we hold about you on computer and IT records (formerly known as a subject access request).
The legislation requires us to respond to a valid request within one month. However, in the event we are unable to meet this timescale (for example due to a large volume of information to be assessed) we will keep you informed of progress towards fulfilling your request.
To request access to personal data we hold about you, please write to our Data Protection Officer using the contact details on this page.
To make a Subject Access Request please email:
sar@nhsbt.nhs.uk
How we use your information for Research and Development
NHSBT is working to find ways to develop better treatments for care. The information we hold on you can be used to help our researchers understand more about causes of illnesses and how best to treat them.
We follow strict rules to make sure your personal data is always kept secure and confidential. Where possible, we take out any information that could identify you, such as your name, address and postcode.
If we cannot practically take out such information, it is our legal responsibility to ask for your explicit consent or to identify an appropriate legal basis to process your data.
How we use your data to support The Organ Donation Register
The personal data that you provide when registering your decision for organ and tissue donation is recorded on the NHS Organ Donor Register and is used to enable your decision to be discussed at the time of potential donation.
NHSBT ask for the minimum data necessary at point of registration to ensure we are able to identify you and that we clearly understand your organ donation decision.
The personal data requested as part of your registration process is detailed below:
Mandatory data items for the purpose of identification and confirmation of your decision
Name (First name, Last name)
Address
Postcode
Date of birth
Organ donation decision (Donate – some or all organs and tissue, Do not donate, Withdraw)
Optional data items to further assist with identification, retrieval of your NHS Number, further understanding of your decision and your contact details
Title
Middle name
Preferred name
How you are recorded on your GP medical record (Female, Male or Neither)
Email
Telephone
Mobile
Faith declaration
The following two additional optional data items (together with data item Gender that may be collected through third party registration partners), are used to help us understand more about the people registering. Ethnicity and Religion are not stored against individual registrations.
Ethnicity
Religion
Contact details such as address, email, telephone and mobile are used for the purposes of completing your registration which may include sending you a confirmation letter. These details will never be used for marketing purposes.
As part of the registration process, some additional personal data items may also be obtained and recorded on your registration to assist with identification at the time of potential donation:
NHS Number
See below NHS England Digital Demographics Batch Service (Public Health Service)
CHI Number
See below NHS National Services Scotland (Public Health Service)
HCN Number
See below Health and Social Care Northern Ireland Business Services Organisation (Public Health Service)
DVLA Driving License Number
If you register your organ donation decision through the Driver and Vehicle Licensing Agency (DVLA)
DVANI Driver Number
Obtained if you register your organ donation decision through the Driver and Vehicle Agency Northern Ireland (DVANI)
The NHS Organ Donor Register shares your personal data within NHSBT and with a select group of NHS organisations and third-party service providers.
Further information on the people and organisations we share information with and the purpose, is detailed below.
Who do you share my personal data with?
NHSBT staff directly involved in the organ and tissue donation process. This includes:
Specialist nurses and administrators for organ and tissue donation, who support the process of organ and tissue donation in the United Kingdom and have access to the minimum data necessary to establish if you have recorded an organ and tissue donation decision, which will help to inform a conversation with your family about organ donation
NHS Organ Donor Register Operations, who have access to your registration data to manage the NHS Organ Donor Register service
Third Party Service Providers. This includes:
NHS Organ Donor Helpline advisors, who have access to the registration data to assist callers in response to their enquiries. This can include creating or updating a registration on the NHS Organ Donor Register
Mailing Service, who are responsible for producing and sending written organ donation registration confirmation letters. The minimum data necessary is shared with the mailing service for this purpose only
Information Technology Services, who provide technical support and maintenance for the NHS Organ Donor Register
NHS England, who provide the NHS App. As a user of the NHS App you can record your organ donation decision and when applicable, you can access your organ donation decision data as recorded on the NHS Organ Donor Register. The NHS App does not store your organ donation decision data but does enable your personal data or decision data to be processed within the NHS Organ Donor Register
Other NHS services who are directly involved in the organ and tissue donation process. This includes:
NHS National Services Scotland (public health service), who employ specialist nurses for tissue donation who support the process of tissue donation in Scotland and have access to the minimum data necessary to establish if you have recorded a tissue donation decision which will help to inform a conversation with your family about organ donation.
Other NHS services who support the organ and tissue donation process. This includes:
NHS England Demographics Batch Service (public health service), who enable the NHS Organ Donor Register to link with this service for residents of England and Wales and share the minimum data necessary in order to retrieve your NHS number and record this on your registration. Your NHS number can further help to identify you
NHS National Services Scotland (public health service), who enable the NHS Organ Donor Register to link with this service for residents of Scotland and share the minimum data necessary in order to retrieve your CHI number and record this on your registration. Your CHI number can further help to identify you
Health and Social Care Northern Ireland (HSCNI) Business Services Organisation (Public Health Service), who enable the NHS Organ Donor Register to link with this service for residents of Northern Ireland and share the minimum data necessary to retrieve your HCN Number and record this on your registration. Your HCN Number can further help to identify you
NHS England (formerly NHS Digital who merged with NHS England in February 2023):
NHSBT are currently working with NHS England and is sharing information for analysis and research for those individuals on the UK Transplant Registry. The purpose of this sharing is to study risk factors for developing skin cancer after organ transplantation, and to improve the care of transplant recipients who develop skin cancer.
NHSBT will only share your data outside the organisation if there is a legal reason to do so, in which case you will usually be informed of this disclosure.
NHSBT works with third parties to provide services to support our work, like telecommunications, ICT support and communications.
All companies that have access to NHSBT data go through a series of strict data protection and privacy checks, and are held to the same high standard of data protection and regulation as NHSBT under the General Data Protection Regulation.
You can request to know which organisations your data has been shared with by contacting Customer Services.
Email the Customer Services team
Marketing
For all services, we’d like to keep in touch with you to inform you of the valuable work and services NHSBT does and inform you of other ways to support NHSBT. You are always in full control of the messages you receive.
If you are a blood donor, we will ask you to provide us with additional contact information like your email address and mobile phone number.
We do this so that we can provide you with timely communications relating to when donation appointments are available, preparing for your donation and letting you know where your donation was issued.
Full details of the terms and conditions associated with being a blood donor
can be viewed on NHSBT’s Give Blood website.
If you want us to change the way we contact you, please let us know by contacting us:
Telephone: 0300 123 23 23
Email the Customer Services team
Please note: if you do choose to opt out of communications it can take up to 30 days to process your request.
The website and cookies
You can use our website without providing any personal details. However, to sign up to any services such as blood donation, you must provide data to support this.
Cookies are a record made on your computer that save information about the web pages you visit and services you use.
You may disable the use of cookies, but this may limit the functionality of our websites or your access to it.
Cookies are files or pieces of information that are stored by your browser on your computer's hard drive.
NHSBT may use cookies to collect information about you and to identify you during your visit to our websites, like the particular site areas you visit and the services you use through our websites.
We collect this information to better tailor our site to your interests and needs.
Cookies may also be used to help speed up your future activities on our websites. For example, a site can recognise that you have provided personal information to us and refrain from requesting the same information a second time.
We also use cookies for online retargeting purposes to show you relevant adverts from us on third-party sites, including social media websites, based on pages you have visited on our site and others.
We hold cookie information for 30 days before the cookie expires.
Most browsers are initially set to accept a cookie. If you prefer, you can set yours to refuse cookies or to alert you when cookies are being sent.
Refusal of cookies at the site you enter may result in an inability to visit certain areas of the site or to receive personalised information when you visit the site.
For further information on 'cookies' please consult the ‘help’ section of your browser.
Our cookie information page
also provides more information.
National Data Opt Out
Our organisation is compliant with the
national data opt-out policy.
Whenever you use a health or care service or using any of our services, important information about you is collected in a patient record for that service.
Collecting this information helps to ensure you get the best possible care and treatment.
The information collected about you when you use these services can also be used and provided to other organisations for purposes beyond your individual care, for instance to help with:
improving the quality and standards of care provided
research into the development of new treatments
preventing illness and diseases
monitoring safety
planning services
Most of the time, anonymised data is used for research and planning so that you cannot be identified in which case your confidential patient information is not needed.
You have a choice about whether you want your confidential patient information to be used in this way. If you are happy with this use of information you do not need to do anything. If you do choose to opt-out your confidential patient information will still be used to support your individual care.
Find out more or register your choice to opt-out
.
You can find out more about how patient information is used for
health and care research
.
You can also find out more about how and
why patient information is used, the safeguards and how decisions are made
.
You can change your mind about your choice at any time.
Data being used or shared for purposes beyond individual care does not include your data being shared with insurance companies or used for marketing purposes and data would only be used in this way with your specific agreement.
Contacting our Data Protection Officer
NHS Blood and Transplant is the Data Controller for the personal data we hold and process about you.
We are also the Data Controller for Serious Hazards of Transfusion (SHOT). Please see
SHOT’s privacy policy
for more information.
The Data Protection Officer is Eleanor Ward who can be contacted:
In writing:
NHS Blood and Transplant
500 North Bristol Park
Filton
Bristol
BS34 7QH
UK
By email:
Email our Data Protection Officer
Contacting the Information Commissioners Office (ICO)
For independent advice about data protection, privacy and data sharing issues, you can contact the independent ICO at:
The Information Commissioner
Wycliffe House
Water Lane
Wilmslow
Cheshire
SK9 5AGF
UK
Tel: 0303 123 1113
Visit the ICO website
Authors: Umar Sabat and Rosie Underwood
Page last updated: 21 March 2024
Sub-policy 13
https://www.nhs.uk/nhs-app/nhs-app-legal-and-cookies/nhs-app-privacy-policy/personal-health-records/:
Cookies on the NHS website
We've put some small files called cookies on your device to make our site work.
We'd also like to use analytics cookies. These collect feedback and send information about how our site is used to services called Adobe Analytics, Adobe Target, Qualtrics Feedback and Google Analytics. We use this information to improve our site.
Let us know if this is OK. We'll use a cookie to save your choice. You can
read more about our cookies
before you choose.
I'm OK with analytics cookies
Do not use analytics cookies
You can change your cookie settings at any time using our
cookies page
.
Skip to main content
Home
NHS App
NHS App legal and cookies
NHS App privacy policies
Back to
NHS App privacy policies
NHS App privacy policy: personal health record services
Version 2, 30 March 2023
Information:
This minor update covers organisational changes in the NHS. You can find more details in the NHS App privacy policy.
Version 2, 30 March 2023
The NHS App privacy policy
provides details of how we use and process any personal information you give us. It also has details of who to contact should you need to speak to the relevant data protection officer.
The information below describes how we use your data when you use personal health record services using the NHS App. The information in this policy also applies when you access these same services by logging in through the NHS website in a web browser.
What are personal health record services?
Personal health record services typically allow you to:
view parts of your GP or hospital care medical records online
message your healthcare professionals online
record information about your health and share this with your GP or hospital online
If your GP surgery, hospital or other care provider offers a personal health record service, this will be made clear on their website along with the functionality available to you.
For NHS funded personal health record services in England, your GP surgery or hospital's chosen service may also be available within the your NHS App. Due to the way personal health record services are made available within the NHS App (through what is technically called a "webview") this is classed as a "connecting service" and NHS England does not undertake any processing of your personal information when you are using the personal health record service. Such connected services are described in the
NHS App terms of use
.
The NHS App is provided by NHS England and supports online access to a range of health services. You can download the app from the App Store and Google Play. You can also use the NHS website to log in.
Who is involved in providing personal health record services?
The following organisations are involved in providing personal health record services available through your NHS App. Their respective roles are described below.
The service purchaser: your GP surgery or hospital
If a personal health record service is available at your GP surgery or hospital, then the GP surgery, the integrated care board (ICB) they belong to, or your hospital will have usually engaged one or more specialised personal health record supplier(s) to provide the service.
Personal health record supplier
A personal health record supplier is a commercial organisation providing the personal health record service on behalf of the service purchaser (your GP surgery or hospital). When choosing a supplier, the service purchaser scrutinises the service including technical, clinical, privacy and security aspects.
The agreements in place with the supplier(s) ensure that your GP surgery or hospital remains a "controller" of your information. This means each has a legal basis for processing your information, and is able to determine the purpose (why) and means (how) of such processing.
The supplier is either of the following, depending on the arrangements your GP surgery or hospital has made with them:
a "processor" on their behalf (which means it processes your personal information in accordance with instructions issued by the service purchaser and is not able to use the information for other purposes)
a “joint controller” with your GP surgery or hospital (subject to agreements setting out how the supplier may process the data)
A supplier may also be an “independent controller” of some of your personal information. This only applies where you have inputted personal information directly into the personal health records service and not shared this with your GP surgery or hospital through the service. For example, if you use the service to keep your own records of blood pressure readings taken at home but do not share these with your GP surgery or hospital.
Your information is not used by the supplier for any purpose other than the personal health record service purpose.
NHS England
NHS England connects the NHS App to the service purchaser's personal health record service. Because NHS England provides the NHS login service it is the controller for the personal information used to verify your identity but not for any health-related information. If you use the NHS App, you will have already verified your identity via the NHS login service, and can directly access the personal health record service through your NHS App. For this verification process to work, the personal health record service provider will process the information from your NHS login account as a processor on behalf of NHS England. The information processed is your:
NHS number
date of birth
first and last names
identity level (you can find out more about
proving your identity
)
unique ID for this service
email address
mobile number
The NHS App also enables you to share your details from your NHS login account with the personal health record service so they can deliver their service. You will be asked if you wish to do this, and the specific pieces of personal information that are shared will be described within the NHS App the first time you use the service. If you do not wish to share these details you should not access the personal health record service using the NHS App.
Who is my personal health record supplier?
The personal health record services offered to you as a patient will depend upon which personal health record suppliers have been engaged by your GP surgery, the integrated care board (ICB) they belong to, or your hospital.
The name of the supplier is shown within your NHS App before any personal health record service is accessed. It will also be named on the service purchaser's website. If you are still unsure who your supplier is, ask the service purchaser (your GP surgery or hospital).
If your GP surgery or hospital does not offer personal health record services, you will not see any options relating to personal health records within your NHS App.
Links to privacy policies and help information
DrDoctor
DrDoctor lets you view and manage referrals and hospital appointments. See your hospital’s privacy policy and the
DrDoctor privacy policy
. Visit the
DrDoctor website
for help.
Health Call
Health Call Solutions lets you view and manage referrals and hospital appointments. See your hospital’s privacy policy and the
Health Call privacy policy
. Visit the
Health Call website
for help.
Healthcare Communications
Healthcare Communications lets you view and manage your hospital referrals and appointments. See your hospital’s privacy policy and
Healthcare Communications’ privacy policy
. Visit the
Healthcare Communications website
for help.
Induction Healthcare (UK) Limited
Induction Healthcare lets you view and manage your referrals and hospital appointments. See your hospital’s privacy policy and the
Induction Healthcare privacy policy
. Visit the
Induction Healthcare website
for help.
Netcall
Netcall lets you view and manage your hospital referrals and appointments. See your hospital’s privacy policy and the
Netcall privacy policy
. Visit the
Netcall website
for help.
Patients Know Best
Patients Know Best (PKB) also operate under the name Care Information Exchange (CIE). It lets you view parts of your GP or hospital care medical records online. You can also message your healthcare professionals, and record information about your health and share this with your GP or hospital.
PKB is a joint data controller with your local hospital for these services. See your hospital’s privacy policy and the
PKB privacy policy
[GP3] or
CIE privacy policy
. Visit the
PKB
or
CIE
websites for help information.
Substrakt Health
Substrakt lets you update your personal details, ask your GP surgery a question, or take part in a patient participation group. See your hospital’s privacy policy and the
Substrakt Health privacy policy
. Visit the
Substrakt website
for help.
Universal Care Plan / Better
The Universal Care Plan (UCP) is available in London and provided by a supplier called Better. It supports digitally sharing ‘What matters to you’ with everybody who cares for you – the ambulance service, GPs, in hospital or at home. See your hospital’s privacy policy and the
Better privacy policy
. Please visit the
UCP website
for more information about the UCP.
What personal data is processed for personal health record services and why?
The personal data processed when you use personal health record services varies depending upon the supplier. It generally include the following categories.
NHS login account information
This is used to identify you to the personal health record service.
Information in personal health records not supplied by you
This includes the content of your GP and hospital medical records, including information such as appointment details, medications, health conditions, messages and test results. Exactly what is shared by a healthcare provider with the personal health record service is determined by the functionality the service offers and local policies on what information the GP surgery or hospital uploads.
Information in personal health records supplied by you
If offered by the personal health record service, this may include information such as measurements (for example, weight and blood pressure), symptom severity ratings, diarised notes and messages provided by you.
Your rights
Data protection law provides a number of rights to you. You can exercise your rights by contacting the appropriate Controller. For your rights in relation to:
NHS login account information (as described above) see the
NHS App privacy policy
your personal health record contents (as described above), contact your GP surgery or hospital for a copy of their privacy policy
any data privacy objections or complaints, see section 9 of
the NHS App privacy policy
for details of how to contact our Data Protection Office
More in
NHS App privacy policies
NHS App privacy policy
NHS App privacy policy: online consultation services
NHS App privacy policy: personal health record services
NHS App privacy policy: messaging services
Page last reviewed: 30 March 2023
Next review due: 30 September 2024
Sub-policy 14
https://www.nhs.uk/nhs-app/nhs-app-legal-and-cookies/nhs-app-privacy-policy/online-consultation-services/:
Cookies on the NHS website
We've put some small files called cookies on your device to make our site work.
We'd also like to use analytics cookies. These collect feedback and send information about how our site is used to services called Adobe Analytics, Adobe Target, Qualtrics Feedback and Google Analytics. We use this information to improve our site.
Let us know if this is OK. We'll use a cookie to save your choice. You can
read more about our cookies
before you choose.
I'm OK with analytics cookies
Do not use analytics cookies
You can change your cookie settings at any time using our
cookies page
.
Skip to main content
Home
NHS App
NHS App legal and cookies
NHS App privacy policies
Back to
NHS App privacy policies
NHS App privacy policy: online consultation services
Version 3, 30 March 2023
Information:
This minor update covers organisational changes in the NHS. You can find more details in the NHS App privacy policy .
The NHS App privacy policy
provides details of how we use, and process, any personal information you give us. It also has details of who to contact should you need to speak to the relevant data protection officer.
The information below describes how we use your information when you use online consultation services within the NHS App (whether accessed in the mobile app or logged in to the NHS website in a web browser).
What are online consultation services?
Online consultations allow you to contact your GP surgery without having to wait on the phone or take time to visit the surgery in person. They may be especially helpful if you are not sure you need a face to face consultation. Online consultations enable you to use a secure online system to ask questions, report symptoms and get advice.
Online consultations are not appropriate for emergencies. If you require urgent care you will be advised to use
NHS 111
, visit
A&E
or call
999
.
An online consultation service usually includes asking a series of questions (called forms-based triage) to identify what you need and direct you to the right service. Online consultations can typically be used for:
asking for test results or a making a routine appointment
describing symptoms to your GP and getting advice (which may sometimes be that a face to face appointment is needed)
If your GP surgery provides an online consultation service, this will be made clear on the GP surgery website.
For NHS nationally funded online consultation services in England, your GP practice's online consultation service may also be available within your NHS App and any requests which patients send to their GP practice will be securely sent from their NHS App to the GP practice system using the online consultation provider (as described in the
NHS App terms of use
).
Your NHS App is provided by NHS England and supports health services such as enabling your GP surgery to provide you with online access to sections of your health record. The NHS App can be downloaded from the App Store and Google Play. You can also log in to your account using the NHS website.
Who is involved in providing online consultation services?
The following organisations are involved in providing online consultation services available through your NHS App. Their respective roles are described below.
Your GP surgery
If an online consultation service is available at your GP surgery, then the GP surgery or the integrated care board (ICB) to which they belong will have usually engaged one or more specialised online consultation supplier(s) to provide the service. The agreements in place with the supplier(s) ensure that your GP surgery remains the 'controller' of the patients' information and that patients' information is not used for any purpose other than the online consultation purpose. In relation to certain online consultation providers NHS England is also a joint data controller of your information alongside your GP surgery, as described below.
Online consultation provider
An online consultation provider is a commercial organisation providing the online consultation service on behalf of your GP surgery. Providers are usually contracted through an NHS England procurement framework, which involves scrutiny of their service including technical, clinical, privacy and security aspects.
An online consultation provider is a 'processor' for the GP surgery which means it processes patients' personal information in accordance with instructions issued by the GP practice and is not able to use the information for other purposes.
NHS England
NHS England will be a controller of personal data relating to your journey through your NHS App (for example that you accessed an online consultation service at a certain time). This is because as NHS England connects your NHS App to the GP surgery's online consultation service.
Because NHS England provides the NHS login service, NHS England is a controller of verified identity information used to access your NHS App and online consultations services used within NHS login. These details are name, age, NHS number, gender, email address. Find out more about verified identities and
the role of NHS login
.
NHS England is not (except as set out below) a controller in respect of your use of an online consultation service, or any health related information you input.
NHS England provides a connection within your NHS App to the online consultation service on behalf of the GP surgery.
In relation to certain online consultation providers, NHS England is also a joint data controller with your GP surgery, as NHS England has a role supporting the roll out of these services and ensuring appropriate information governance contracts are in place. Your GP will retain responsibility for managing your personal data and should be your primary point of contact. NHS England will be responsible for managing any system-wide incidents and national assurance of compliance with data protection legislation. For more information in relation to NHS England's role as a joint controller with your GP surgery see
NHS England's privacy notice
. The online consultation provider to whom this applies is eConsult Health Limited – for more information see
eConsult's GP online consultation service privacy notice
.
Who is my online consultation provider?
The online consultation services offered to you as a patient will depend upon which online consultation providers have been engaged by your GP surgery or the integrated care board (ICB) to which they belong.
The name of the provider is shown within your NHS App before any online consultation begins. It will also be named on the GP surgery website. If you are still unsure who your provider is, ask your GP surgery.
If your GP surgery does not offer online consultation services you will not see any options relating to online consultations within your NHS App.
Online consultation providers currently available through your NHS App
Below, you can find links to privacy policies, and help and support, for online consultation providers
.
Our
help page about online consultations
has information about using this feature.
Accurx Limited
Accurx allows you to answer questions online and get a response from your GP surgery. You can view the
Accurx privacy policy
.
eConsult Health Limited
eConsult also trades as WebGP. You can answer questions online and get a response from your GP surgery. You may be able to get advice for your child if it's available at your surgery. You can view the
eConsult GP online consultations privacy notice
.
Engage Health Systems Limited
Engage allows you to answer questions online and get a response from your GP surgery, and to view your online consultations and any responses from your GP surgery. You can view the
Engage privacy policy
.
Spectra Analytics (trading as PATCHS)
PATCHS allows you to answer questions online and get a response from your GP surgery. You can view responses, check your past requests and send a new request. You can view the
PATCHS Patient End User License Agreement
.
What personal data is processed for online consultation services and why?
The personal data processed when you use an online consultation service varies depending upon the provider. Generally, it includes the following.
Identity and contact information
Your identity and contact information is used to confirm who you are and that your requests are directed to your GP surgery. This information comprises:
NHS login account information: name, date of birth, NHS number
information within your GP medical record: postal address
manually entered information: gender, email address, telephone number
Online consultation responses
The answers you provide to questions asked by the online consultation service and the replies from your GP surgery are likely to contain sensitive medical information. Your requests and responses will be used to determine what the next appropriate steps should be.
For example:
if a need for urgent care is indicated, you will be advised to contact emergency services direct
your needs may be prioritised based on the information you have given
an appropriate response can be given which may be that a face-to-face appointment should be arranged or refer you to a more suitable service
Your rights
Data protection law provides a number of rights to you. You can exercise your rights by contacting the appropriate controller:
For your rights relating to NHS login account information (as described above) see the
NHS App privacy policy
For your rights in relation to your online consultation responses (as described above), contact your GP surgery for a copy of their privacy policy
For your rights in relation to NHS England's role as a joint controller with your GP practice see
NHS England's privacy notice for providing online consultation services
For your rights in relation to any data privacy objections or complaints, see the
NHS App privacy policy
for details of how to contact our Data Protection Office
More in
NHS App privacy policies
NHS App privacy policy
NHS App privacy policy: online consultation services
NHS App privacy policy: personal health record services
NHS App privacy policy: messaging services
Page last reviewed: 30 March 2023
Next review due: 30 September 2024
Sub-policy 15
https://access.login.nhs.uk/privacy:
Cookies on NHS login
Cookies collect information about how you use NHS login to help us make our site work as well as possible.
We would also like to use analytics cookies to improve our service.
Accept all cookies
Choose your cookies
Go back
Your privacy on NHS login
Version 4.4 – July 2024
Contents
This privacy notice will explain:
Who we are
Why we collect your personal information
What personal information we collect about you
How we use the personal information we collect about you
How we protect your personal information
Connecting Parties using NHS login
Sharing information with Connected NHS Systems
How long we store your personal information
Where your personal information is stored
Cookies
Your rights
Complaints
Our legal basis for using your information
Changes to our privacy notice
Who we are
NHS England leads the National Health Service (NHS) in England. It sets the priorities and direction of the NHS. NHS England wants everyone to have greater control of their health and wellbeing, and to be supported to live longer, healthier lives.
Find out more on the NHS England website
Mentions of ‘us’ and ‘we’ mean NHS England and ‘you’ means anyone using NHS login.
We have developed a platform for you to prove your identity and create your own NHS login account. With this, you can securely access ‘Connected Services’ such as Health and Social Care related websites and apps, provided by the NHS or by third parties on behalf of the NHS ‘Connecting Parties’.
We are the data controller of the personal information you provide to us when:
we verify your identity
you use NHS login to access Connected Services
you manage your NHS login account
you contact us
Why we collect your personal information
To create your NHS login account, we need to take some personal information from you. The NHS login account will allow you to securely access any NHS login connected service which displays the ‘NHS login’ sign in button. We collect personal information from you to:
verify who you are
provide you with an NHS login so that you can access Connected Services and manage your NHS login account
provide Connecting Parties with data you explicitly agree to us sharing
to inform you of new Connected Services which you can access using NHS login
send direct communication to your registered NHS login contact details so that we can support you in the use of your NHS login account
support User Research
Collecting this information also allows us to manage our service, so that we can:
improve our manual and automated
ID
checking function by monitoring the rates of successful and unsuccessful
ID
verification submissions with existing and proposed suppliers
provide data in support of the NHS England protective monitoring plan to improve the security of its services
improve the accuracy of the data held within NHS login and our Connected NHS systems such as the Personal Demographic Service (PDS)
provide you with information so that we can support your use of NHS login via the Help Centre service or directly to you (once you have created an account with NHS login)
analyse or share data that is aggregated or anonymous with organisations within, or whose work helps, the NHS. This is to help the NHS understand how your NHS account is being used so we can make improvements to it and other NHS services
What personal information we collect about you
The different items of your personal information which you choose to provide to conduct
ID
checks will determine the level of identity verification you achieve. The levels of identity verification currently are low-level, medium-level, and high-level. The level of identity verification which you have will affect which Connected Services you are able to access using NHS login. The Connected Service will conduct an assessment to identify the level required. Once you have established a low or medium-level you may at any time provide the further personal information required to move to a higher level. To support this, NHS login provides various methods to achieve the higher level of identity verification, including, in some cases, relying on verification which has already been conducted by your GP practice.
We collect your basic personal details needed to process your NHS login application, including:
for the low-level identity verification, NHS login will process your email address and any mobile phone or landline number you add to your account
for the medium-level identity verification, NHS login will process your email address, phone numbers and, depending on the user journey selected either ‘first name, middle name, last name, date of birth and postcode (which allows us to access your NHS number)’ or ‘NHS number and date of birth (which allows us to access your first name, middle name, last name, date of birth and postcode)’
for the high-level identity verification, conducted using photographic identity documentation, NHS login will process all of the data items in the medium-level identity verification plus the special category information detailed below
for high level identity verification which leverages Patient Online (POL) credentials, NHS login will process all of the data items in the medium-level identity verification plus GP Account ID, GP ODS code, GP system Linkage key
for high level identity verification, where identity verification is conducted within a care setting and an NHS login account is generated, NHS login will process all of the data items in the medium-level identity verification plus GP ODS code
a unique
ID
which is used to validate the transaction between us and our third party supplier
for the NHS login Help Centre, NHS login will process your email address and name provided by you
Special category information (sensitive personal data)
For high-level identity verification we also collect special category information needed to verify your identity to confirm a likeness and liveness check – this is achieved by reviewing:
a short video of you
a video photo frame taken during the use of the technology provided by our third party supplier
biometric data of your face that will include ethnicity
a biometric description of the evaluated data from the use of the face verification technology provided by our approved
ID
supplier
photo
ID
and information from your identity document
Technical information
In all cases we also collect technical information needed for security and to set up and manage your account to a Connected Service. This includes:
linkage key information provided by your GP Practice to you (GP Account
ID
, GP ODS code, GP system Linkage key)
audit data and event logs
online identifiers, like your Internet Protocol (IP) addresses
How we use the personal information we collect about you
Identity and contact information
In the case of low-level, mid-level and high-level accounts, we will use your personal information to create an account for you to access Connected Services.
In the case of mid-level and high-level accounts we will use your personal information to match you against the record on the Personal Demographics Service (PDS).
Find out more about PDS
In the case of high-level verified accounts NHS login will verify your identity online using manual and automated verification processes. Where an automated decision cannot be made successfully, a manual verification process is then used.
Use of Automated and Manual processes to verify your identity
We may also use third party service providers to support our delivery of NHS login. Where any such organisation has access to your personal data they will be a processor acting for us, subject to a contract with us, required to meet our security and privacy standards and may only process your personal data for the sole purpose of fulfilling our instructions.
Approved identity verification services provide NHS login with an approved automated online identity verification process. As part of the automated identity verification process for high-level identity verification, users will be asked to present photo identity documentation and conduct a live video using biometric identity verification technology. The personal data from your photo identity document is processed using technology which can automatically read the data on the document. This is checked against the Personal Demographic Service (PDS) so that we can match you to your NHS number. Users of the automated identity verification process can select, via the options presented to them, to come out of the automated journey. They can then progress their submission via the manual ID verification journey. In circumstances where the automated identity process cannot positively match you to a record, your submission is then filtered to the manual identity verification process.
The third party services are instructed to provide:
NHS login with a purpose-built identity verification platform which uses biometrics provided by you so that a likeness and liveness check can be conducted. To facilitate this, NHS login will pass across a ‘crop’ of the photo from the identity document you submitted which is then used against the video that you submit during this process
NHS login with a purpose-built document verification platform which uses the photo identity document provided by you so that the submitted document can be validated against the security features on the document and to provide NHS England with a snapshot of the ‘plain text’ information on the document so that it supports the user registration journey
Trained ID verification staff from NHS England and approved suppliers complete all manual online verification processes. They also review all of the unsuccessful fully automated online ID verification processes for high-level identity verification. As part of the manual ID verification user journey, users will be asked to provide personal data items, for example, NHS number, date of birth, first name, last name and postcode. For high-level identity verification they will also be asked to present photo ID documentation and upload a video selfie which records the user speaking the challenge code which has been sent to them. Trained ID checkers will check this against the details held within the Personal Demographic Service (PDS) so that we can match you to your NHS number.
All submissions, successful or unsuccessful, and manual or automated, are subject to quality assurance and audit checks.
Service information
We will use your NHS login registered email address to send you email communications to support you in the use of your NHS login account.
User Research
We will ask you if you would like to join our user research panel for user research to improve NHS login and connected services when you register for NHS login or on a subsequent login when there are new functions or features available within the NHS login service. If you choose to do so, we will use your NHS login registered email address to email you a short survey to fill in about you and your health. Your answers will help make sure we invite you to user research that is relevant to you.
When you have signed up, we may ask you to:
try new features
answer more questions by email
talk to our researchers about your experience of using NHS login or connected services
You can always say no to an invite, and you can leave the user research panel at any time.
How we protect your personal information
We take the security of your personal information very seriously. We have set up security measures, policies and procedures to make sure your personal information is protected.
We protect your personal information by:
training staff to understand data and security roles and responsibilities
ensuring security and confidentiality policies are in place for our staff who have access to personal information
monitoring our service
using security features such as two-factor authentication
introducing features such as ‘passwordless authentication’ and ‘remember my device’ to improve security and functionality
following good practice guidance provided by the
National Technical Authority
using legally binding agreements with all organisations, including those we use to process your personal information
managing the accounts you have created in NHS login to protect you and the NHS login service
Whilst we follow good industry practices to support the safe and secure provision of NHS login, we cannot manage the personal security of your devices used to access your NHS login account or Connected Services, as this is your responsibility. The National Cyber Security Centre (NCSC) has guidance which can be reviewed:
https://www.ncsc.gov.uk/section/information-for/individuals-families
Connecting Parties using NHS login
Connecting Parties will be onboarded to NHS login as part of an assured process. Once their service is onboarded successfully, you will be able to use NHS login to securely access their service. The Connecting Parties may also have their own method for you to securely access their service, and this will co-exist with the NHS login service.
Connecting Parties will always relate to the provision of NHS, or social care, services to you. The services may be provided by an organisation directly commissioned to provide NHS, or social care, services or by a supplier on behalf of a commissioned organisation.
A data controller decides how and why personal information is processed. NHS England is the Data Controller for the identity and verification information the NHS login service processes as part of its function, and the Connecting Party is a Data Processor to support this function.
Connected Services may also ask you to share personal information from your NHS login account so that they can tailor their service for you. NHS login will present you with the option to share the personal information with the Connected Service, and if you agree to this, the Connected Service becomes the Data Controller for the NHS login data that you have agreed to share with them.
Your access to some Connected Service may be dependent on your agreement to share the data between NHS login and the Connected Service, and other services may offer an alternative route outside of NHS login to access the Connected Service. The Connected Service may require you to provide certain information in order to use their service.
We do not have access to any information within your medical records or the product provided by the Connected Services.
Each Connected Service you visit from NHS login will have their own terms and conditions and privacy notice. These should be read in conjunction with the NHS login
terms and conditions
and this privacy notice, so that you are clear on how your personal information is managed.
Sharing information with Connected NHS Systems
As part of the
ID
verification process, NHS login use the information held on the Personal Demographic Service (PDS) to match your verification request to an NHS record. Some of the data items submitted to NHS login, such as email address and mobile phone numbers may be more current than the information held on PDS, as such, if you have a High-level identity verified NHS login account you can update these data items from NHS login to your record held on PDS. These data items may change or increase over time; however, this will be made clear to you from the information presented to you on the pages.
As part of the Help centre service, we will share the information you provide with our Corporate Service Management service. This is so that we can support you whilst you are using the NHS login service.
How long we store your personal information
We store your personal information for as long as is reasonably necessary and legally justifiable. The length of time we store your information for will depend on legal, regulatory or technical requirements. In any event, we follow the Records Management Code of Practice for Health and Social Care (2016). The retention periods are explained here.
User accounts
You can delete your account at any time.
NHS login will delete:
low and medium level verified accounts that have not been accessed for 2 years and 30 days
high level verified accounts that have not been accessed for 10 years
NHS login will email users in advance to tell them if they need to access their account to keep it active. They will send this to the email registered for the NHS login account.
If your account is deleted, you will need to verify your identity again if you want to use NHS login.
ID
verification evidence
Information processed as part of your
ID
verification for high-level identity verification will be stored for six months, starting from the date we verify the details on your account. This is true whether or not such verification is successful, and whether or not your account remains open. After this, your proof of identity information will be securely deleted.
We may retain some extracts from your submitted ID document, such as the plain text data on the document and not the photo, for longer than six months to support our ID checker training. The ID checker training material is stored securely and separately from the ID verification evidence submitted by you.
Log data
After an action is logged, we will store this general log data for one year. For example, an IP address that shows activity like webpage access, account login requests and login attempts.
Audit event information
We store audit event information for 8 years from the event taking place.
Audit event information lets us record:
who verifies the identity evidence you provide
when the
ID
verification took place
the result of the
ID
verification
when identity evidence is to be deleted
details of the person verified
deletion requests and who made them
Where your personal information is stored and processed
We (including all processors) securely store and process your information in the EEA. We will make sure your information is given the level of protection required by law and NHS policies.
Cookies
We put small files called cookies onto your device, like your mobile phone or computer. We put strictly necessary cookies on your device for NHS login to work.
Read more about cookies
Your rights
Data protection laws provide you with a number of rights which you can exercise by contacting the appropriate Data Controller. NHS login does not hold any medical information but does hold the personal information described earlier to establish your identification.
These general rights allow you to:
request a copy of your personal information by completing a
subject access request form
change your information if it is wrong or incomplete
request your personal information is deleted – if you believe it is no longer needed, though we may not be able to delete your information if there is a legal reason for us to not delete it
request a restriction on the use of your personal information – if it is wrong and would like it to be changed before being used again
Complaints
We will investigate and attempt to resolve any data privacy objections and complaints relating to your NHS login account.
We will make every reasonable effort to allow you to exercise your rights as quickly as possible and within the timescales provided by data protection laws.
You can contact our Data Protection Office to make a complaint:
By email
enquiries@nhsdigital.nhs.uk
By post
Data Protection Officer
7 and 8 Wellington Place
Leeds
West Yorkshire
LS1 4AP
We ask that you try to resolve any issues with us first, although you have the right to complain about how we process your personal information. You can do this by emailing
enquiries@nhsdigital.nhs.uk
or you can go through the Information Commissioner’s Office (ICO). The ICO is the regulator for data protection.
Our legal basis for using your information
If you are a user from England
The Secretary of State for Health and Social Care has directed NHS England to establish and operate the NHS login service in England. This legal direction is known as the
NHS login Directions 2021
. Under these Directions, NHS England is a joint controller with the Department of Health and Social Care for this service.
Our legal basis to process personal data and special categories of personal data to provide this service in England is:
UK GDPR Article 6(1)(a) – consent (if you agree to non-essential cookies or agree to take part in user research).
UK GDPR Article 6(1)(c) – legal obligation.
UK GDPR Article 9(2)(h) – management of health or social care systems and services and Data Protection Act 2018, Schedule 1, part 1, paragraph 2 – health or social care purposes.
UK GDPR Article 9(2)(g) – substantial public interest and Data Protection Act 2018, Schedule 1, Part 2, Paragraph 6 – Statutory etc. and government purposes.
If you are a user from Wales
Digital Health and Care Wales (DHCW)
has requested NHS England to provide NHS login services to residents of Wales that register for an NHS login account in the NHS Wales App. This is known as the
NHS login for the NHS Wales App request 2022
.
DHCW has also requested NHS England to provide the NHS login service as an authentication and identification method for residents of Wales to access services delivered by third party suppliers on behalf of health providers in Wales (Third Party Connected Services). This is known as the
NHS login for health services supplied by third party Apps in Wales Request 2024
.
In order for you to use NHS login in DHCW’s NHS Wales App and in Third Party Connected Services, you will be asked to share your personal data from your NHS login account with DHCW and/or the Third Party Connected Service. If you agree, our legal basis to share your information with DHCW is s261(5)(d) of the Health and Social Care Act 2012 and our legal basis to share your information with the Third Party Connected Service is s261(2)(c) of the Health and Social Care Act 2012.
Our legal basis to process personal data and special categories of personal data to provide this service in Wales is:
UK GDPR Article 6(1)(a) – consent (if you agree to non-essential cookies or agree to take part in user research).
UK GDPR Article 6 (1)(e) – public task.
UK GDPR Article 9(2)(g) – substantial public interest and Data Protection Act 2018, Schedule 1, Part 2, Paragraph 6 – Statutory etc. and government purposes.
If you are a user from the Isle of Man
The
Isle of Man Department of Health and Social Care (IOMDHSC)
has requested NHS England to provide the NHS App and NHS login to Isle of Man residents that register for an account. This request is known as the
Isle of Man Access to the NHS App Request 2021
.
Our legal basis to process personal data and special categories of personal data to provide this service in the Isle of Man is:
UK GDPR Article 6(1)(a) – consent (if you agree to non-essential cookies or agree to take part in user research).
UK GDPR Article 6 (1)(e) – public task
UK GDPR Article 9(2)(g) – substantial public interest and Data Protection Act 2018, Schedule 1, Part 2, Paragraph 6 – Statutory etc. and government purposes.
Changes to our privacy notice
Our privacy notice may change. The latest version of our privacy notice will be accessible through NHS login. We will inform you through NHS login if we make any material changes to our privacy notice, cookies policy or terms and conditions.
Our policies
Terms and conditions
Your privacy on NHS login
Cookies on NHS login
You need to
enable JavaScript to access NHS login on your browser
Sub-policy 16
https://www.nhs.uk/nhs-services/online-services/nhs-app/nhs-app-legal-and-cookies/nhs-app-privacy-policy/personal-health-records/:
Cookies on the NHS website
We've put some small files called cookies on your device to make our site work.
We'd also like to use analytics cookies. These collect feedback and send information about how our site is used to services called Adobe Analytics, Adobe Target, Qualtrics Feedback and Google Analytics. We use this information to improve our site.
Let us know if this is OK. We'll use a cookie to save your choice. You can
read more about our cookies
before you choose.
I'm OK with analytics cookies
Do not use analytics cookies
You can change your cookie settings at any time using our
cookies page
.
Skip to main content
Home
NHS App
NHS App legal and cookies
NHS App privacy policies
Back to
NHS App privacy policies
NHS App privacy policy: personal health record services
Version 2, 30 March 2023
Information:
This minor update covers organisational changes in the NHS. You can find more details in the NHS App privacy policy.
Version 2, 30 March 2023
The NHS App privacy policy
provides details of how we use and process any personal information you give us. It also has details of who to contact should you need to speak to the relevant data protection officer.
The information below describes how we use your data when you use personal health record services using the NHS App. The information in this policy also applies when you access these same services by logging in through the NHS website in a web browser.
What are personal health record services?
Personal health record services typically allow you to:
view parts of your GP or hospital care medical records online
message your healthcare professionals online
record information about your health and share this with your GP or hospital online
If your GP surgery, hospital or other care provider offers a personal health record service, this will be made clear on their website along with the functionality available to you.
For NHS funded personal health record services in England, your GP surgery or hospital's chosen service may also be available within the your NHS App. Due to the way personal health record services are made available within the NHS App (through what is technically called a "webview") this is classed as a "connecting service" and NHS England does not undertake any processing of your personal information when you are using the personal health record service. Such connected services are described in the
NHS App terms of use
.
The NHS App is provided by NHS England and supports online access to a range of health services. You can download the app from the App Store and Google Play. You can also use the NHS website to log in.
Who is involved in providing personal health record services?
The following organisations are involved in providing personal health record services available through your NHS App. Their respective roles are described below.
The service purchaser: your GP surgery or hospital
If a personal health record service is available at your GP surgery or hospital, then the GP surgery, the integrated care board (ICB) they belong to, or your hospital will have usually engaged one or more specialised personal health record supplier(s) to provide the service.
Personal health record supplier
A personal health record supplier is a commercial organisation providing the personal health record service on behalf of the service purchaser (your GP surgery or hospital). When choosing a supplier, the service purchaser scrutinises the service including technical, clinical, privacy and security aspects.
The agreements in place with the supplier(s) ensure that your GP surgery or hospital remains a "controller" of your information. This means each has a legal basis for processing your information, and is able to determine the purpose (why) and means (how) of such processing.
The supplier is either of the following, depending on the arrangements your GP surgery or hospital has made with them:
a "processor" on their behalf (which means it processes your personal information in accordance with instructions issued by the service purchaser and is not able to use the information for other purposes)
a “joint controller” with your GP surgery or hospital (subject to agreements setting out how the supplier may process the data)
A supplier may also be an “independent controller” of some of your personal information. This only applies where you have inputted personal information directly into the personal health records service and not shared this with your GP surgery or hospital through the service. For example, if you use the service to keep your own records of blood pressure readings taken at home but do not share these with your GP surgery or hospital.
Your information is not used by the supplier for any purpose other than the personal health record service purpose.
NHS England
NHS England connects the NHS App to the service purchaser's personal health record service. Because NHS England provides the NHS login service it is the controller for the personal information used to verify your identity but not for any health-related information. If you use the NHS App, you will have already verified your identity via the NHS login service, and can directly access the personal health record service through your NHS App. For this verification process to work, the personal health record service provider will process the information from your NHS login account as a processor on behalf of NHS England. The information processed is your:
NHS number
date of birth
first and last names
identity level (you can find out more about
proving your identity
)
unique ID for this service
email address
mobile number
The NHS App also enables you to share your details from your NHS login account with the personal health record service so they can deliver their service. You will be asked if you wish to do this, and the specific pieces of personal information that are shared will be described within the NHS App the first time you use the service. If you do not wish to share these details you should not access the personal health record service using the NHS App.
Who is my personal health record supplier?
The personal health record services offered to you as a patient will depend upon which personal health record suppliers have been engaged by your GP surgery, the integrated care board (ICB) they belong to, or your hospital.
The name of the supplier is shown within your NHS App before any personal health record service is accessed. It will also be named on the service purchaser's website. If you are still unsure who your supplier is, ask the service purchaser (your GP surgery or hospital).
If your GP surgery or hospital does not offer personal health record services, you will not see any options relating to personal health records within your NHS App.
Links to privacy policies and help information
DrDoctor
DrDoctor lets you view and manage referrals and hospital appointments. See your hospital’s privacy policy and the
DrDoctor privacy policy
. Visit the
DrDoctor website
for help.
Health Call
Health Call Solutions lets you view and manage referrals and hospital appointments. See your hospital’s privacy policy and the
Health Call privacy policy
. Visit the
Health Call website
for help.
Healthcare Communications
Healthcare Communications lets you view and manage your hospital referrals and appointments. See your hospital’s privacy policy and
Healthcare Communications’ privacy policy
. Visit the
Healthcare Communications website
for help.
Induction Healthcare (UK) Limited
Induction Healthcare lets you view and manage your referrals and hospital appointments. See your hospital’s privacy policy and the
Induction Healthcare privacy policy
. Visit the
Induction Healthcare website
for help.
Netcall
Netcall lets you view and manage your hospital referrals and appointments. See your hospital’s privacy policy and the
Netcall privacy policy
. Visit the
Netcall website
for help.
Patients Know Best
Patients Know Best (PKB) also operate under the name Care Information Exchange (CIE). It lets you view parts of your GP or hospital care medical records online. You can also message your healthcare professionals, and record information about your health and share this with your GP or hospital.
PKB is a joint data controller with your local hospital for these services. See your hospital’s privacy policy and the
PKB privacy policy
[GP3] or
CIE privacy policy
. Visit the
PKB
or
CIE
websites for help information.
Substrakt Health
Substrakt lets you update your personal details, ask your GP surgery a question, or take part in a patient participation group. See your hospital’s privacy policy and the
Substrakt Health privacy policy
. Visit the
Substrakt website
for help.
Universal Care Plan / Better
The Universal Care Plan (UCP) is available in London and provided by a supplier called Better. It supports digitally sharing ‘What matters to you’ with everybody who cares for you – the ambulance service, GPs, in hospital or at home. See your hospital’s privacy policy and the
Better privacy policy
. Please visit the
UCP website
for more information about the UCP.
What personal data is processed for personal health record services and why?
The personal data processed when you use personal health record services varies depending upon the supplier. It generally include the following categories.
NHS login account information
This is used to identify you to the personal health record service.
Information in personal health records not supplied by you
This includes the content of your GP and hospital medical records, including information such as appointment details, medications, health conditions, messages and test results. Exactly what is shared by a healthcare provider with the personal health record service is determined by the functionality the service offers and local policies on what information the GP surgery or hospital uploads.
Information in personal health records supplied by you
If offered by the personal health record service, this may include information such as measurements (for example, weight and blood pressure), symptom severity ratings, diarised notes and messages provided by you.
Your rights
Data protection law provides a number of rights to you. You can exercise your rights by contacting the appropriate Controller. For your rights in relation to:
NHS login account information (as described above) see the
NHS App privacy policy
your personal health record contents (as described above), contact your GP surgery or hospital for a copy of their privacy policy
any data privacy objections or complaints, see section 9 of
the NHS App privacy policy
for details of how to contact our Data Protection Office
More in
NHS App privacy policies
NHS App privacy policy
NHS App privacy policy: online consultation services
NHS App privacy policy: personal health record services
NHS App privacy policy: messaging services
Page last reviewed: 30 March 2023
Next review due: 30 September 2024